Nevada, session 83, AB228.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 293 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 28, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. “Absent ballot” means a ballot voted by a person who
expects to be or is absent from the polling place for his or her
precinct or district on election day.
Sec. 3. “Absent voter” means a registered voter who has
received or who has voted an absent ballot.
Sec. 4. “Proof of identity” means any of the following forms
of identification which show the name of and contain a
recognizable photograph of the person to whom the identification
is issued:
1. A driver’s license or identification card issued by the
Department of Motor Vehicles.
2. An identification card issued by:
(a) This State or another state, the District of Columbia or any
territory of the United States;
(b) The United States Government;
(c) A college or university within the Nevada System of Higher
Education; or
(d) A public technical school in this State.
3. An employee identification card issued by this State, an
agency or political subdivision, thereof, or the United States
Government.
4. A passport issued by the United States Government.
5. A military identification card issued by any branch of the
Armed Forces of the United States.
6. An identification card issued by a federally recognized
Indian tribe.
7. A permit to carry a concealed firearm issued pursuant to
the provisions of NRS 202.3653 to 202.369, inclusive,
 which is, except as otherwise provided by specific statute,
current or expired for less than 4 years or, if the holder is 70 years
of age or older, current or expired for any length of time.
Sec. 5. 1. When it appears to the satisfaction of the county
clerk that an absent ballot central counting board will expedite the
work of tallying the absent ballot vote of the county, the county
clerk may appoint such a board.
2. In counties where an absent ballot central counting board
has been appointed, no central election board may be appointed.
The absent ballot central counting board shall perform the duties
of the central election board.
-
*AB228*

– 4 –
Sec. 6. 1. An absent ballot central counting board consists
of election board officers appointed in such numbers as the county
clerk determines to be required by the volume of absent ballots
requested.
2. The county clerk’s deputies who perform duties in
connection with elections shall be deemed officers of the absent
ballot central counting board.
3. When requested by the county clerk, the sheriff shall
appoint a deputy sheriff to keep order during the counting of the
absent ballot votes by the absent ballot central counting board.
4. The absent ballot central counting board is under the
direction of the county clerk.
Sec. 7. An absent ballot must be voted:
1. On a paper ballot; or
2. By any other system authorized by state or federal law.
Sec. 8. As used in sections 8 to 15, inclusive, of this act,
“sufficient written notice” means a:
1. Written request for an absent ballot that is signed by the
registered voter and returned to the county clerk in person or by
mail or approved electronic transmission;
2. Form prescribed by the Secretary of State that is completed
and signed by the registered voter and returned to the county clerk
in person or by mail or by approved electronic transmission; or
3. Form provided by the Federal Government.
Sec. 9. 1. The county clerk of each county shall prepare an
absent ballot for the use of registered voters who have requested
absent ballots. The county clerk shall make reasonable
accommodations for the use of the absent ballot by a person who
is elderly or disabled, including, without limitation, by providing,
upon request, the absent ballot in 12-point type to a person who is
elderly or disabled.
2. The ballot must be prepared and ready for distribution to:
(a) Each registered voter who:
(1) Resides within the State, not later than 20 days before
the election in which it is to be used; and
(2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), resides
outside the State, not later than 40 days before a primary election,
presidential preference primary election or general election, if
possible.
(b) Each covered voter who is entitled to have a military
overseas ballot transmitted pursuant to the provisions of chapter
293D of NRS or the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee
Voting Act, 52 U.S.C. §§ 20301 et seq., not later than the time
required by those provisions.
-
*AB228*

– 5 –
3. Any untimely legal action which would prevent the ballot
from being distributed to any voter pursuant to subsection 2 is
moot and of no effect.
Sec. 10. 1. A person who, during the 6 months immediately
preceding an election, distributes to more than a total of 500
registered voters a form to request an absent ballot for the election
shall:
(a) Distribute the form prescribed by the Secretary of State,
which must, in 14-point type or larger at the top of the first page of
the form:
(1) Identify the person who is distributing the form; and
(2) Include the following notice stating, with the first
sentence of the notice in bold type:

This is not an official elections notice from the Secretary
of State or your county or city clerk. This is a form to
request an absent ballot that you may submit to your county
or city clerk if you want to vote by absent ballot. However,
even if you want to vote by absent ballot, you do not need to
submit this form if you have already requested an absent
ballot for this election year or are already entitled to receive
an absent ballot for all elections.

(b) Not later than 28 days before distributing such a form,
provide to the county clerk of each county to which a form will be
distributed written notification of the approximate number of
forms to be distributed to voters in the county and of the first date
on which the forms will be distributed.
(c) Not return or offer to return to a county clerk a form that
was mailed to a registered voter pursuant to this subsection.
(d) Not mail such a form later than 35 days before the election.
2. The provisions of this section do not authorize a person to
vote by absent ballot if the person is not otherwise eligible to vote
by absent ballot.
Sec. 11. 1. Except as otherwise provided in chapter 293D of
NRS and section 20 of this act, a registered voter who requests and
receives an absent ballot may vote only by absent ballot at the
election for which the absent ballot was issued.
2. If a registered voter has requested an absent ballot and the
absent ballot has been mailed or issued, the county clerk shall
notify the appropriate election board that the registered voter has
requested an absent ballot.
Sec. 12. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
NRS 293.272 and 293.502 and sections 14 and 15 of this act, a
-
*AB228*

– 6 –
registered voter may request an absent ballot if, before 5 p.m. on
the 14th calendar day preceding the election, the registered voter:
(a) Provides sufficient written notice to the county clerk; and
(b) Has identified himself or herself to the satisfaction of the
county clerk.
2. A registered voter with a disability may use the system for
approved electronic transmission established by the Secretary of
State pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 293D.200 to request an
absent ballot in accordance with NRS 293.269951.
3. A registered voter may request an absent ballot for all
elections held during the year he or she requests an absent ballot.
4. A county clerk shall consider a request from a registered
voter who has given sufficient written notice on a form provided
by the Federal Government as a request for an absent ballot for
the primary election, presidential preference primary election and
general election immediately following the date on which the
county clerk received the request.
5. It is unlawful for a person fraudulently to request an
absent ballot in the name of another person or to induce or coerce
another person fraudulently to request an absent ballot in the
name of another person. A person who violates this subsection is
guilty of a category E felony and shall be punished as provided in
NRS 193.130.
Sec. 13. 1. Every request for an absent ballot must be made
available for public inspection.
2. A county clerk who allows a person to copy information
from an application for an absent ballot is immune from any civil
or criminal liability for any damage caused by the distribution of
that information, unless the county clerk knowingly and willingly
allows a person who intends to use the information to further an
unlawful act to copy such information.
Sec. 14. 1. Any registered voter who is unable to go to the
polls:
(a) Because of an illness or disability resulting in confinement
in a hospital, sanatorium, dwelling or nursing home; or
(b) Because the registered voter is suddenly hospitalized,
becomes seriously ill or is called away from home after the time
has elapsed for requesting an absent ballot for the election
pursuant to subsection 1 of section 12 of this act,
 may submit a written request to the county clerk for an absent
ballot. The request must be submitted before 5 p.m. on the day of
the election.
2. If the county clerk determines that a request submitted
pursuant to subsection 1 includes the information required
pursuant to subsection 3, the county clerk shall, at the office of the
-
*AB228*

– 7 –
county clerk, deliver an absent ballot to the person designated in
the request to obtain the absent ballot for the registered voter.
3. A written request submitted pursuant to subsection 1 must
include:
(a) The name, address and signature of the registered voter
requesting the absent ballot;
(b) The name, address and signature of the person designated
by the registered voter to obtain, deliver and return the absent
ballot for the registered voter;
(c) A brief statement of the illness or disability of the registered
voter or of facts sufficient to establish that the registered voter was
called away from home after the time had elapsed for requesting
the absent ballot;
(d) If the registered voter is confined in a hospital, sanatorium,
dwelling or nursing home, a statement that he or she will be
confined therein on the day of the election; and
(e) Unless the person designated pursuant to paragraph (b)
will mark and sign the absent ballot on behalf of the registered
voter pursuant to subsection 5, a statement signed under penalty
of perjury that only the registered voter will mark and sign the
absent ballot.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, in order to
vote the absent ballot, the registered voter must, in accordance
with the instructions:
(a) Mark and fold the absent ballot;
(b) Deposit the absent ballot in the return envelope and seal
the return envelope;
(c) Affix his or her signature on the return envelope in the
space provided for the signature;
(d) Write in the space provided on the return envelope one of
the following:
(1) The last four digits of his or her driver’s license number
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles;
(2) If the voter does not have a driver’s license number
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles, the last four digits of
his or her social security number; or
(3) If the voter does not have a driver’s license number
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles or a social security
number, the identification number issued by the county clerk
pursuant to NRS 293.507.
(e) Close the attached flap over the signature and identifying
numbers written on the return envelope; and
(f) Mail or deliver the return envelope in a manner authorized
by law.
-
*AB228*

– 8 –
5. A person designated in a request submitted pursuant to
subsection 3 may, on behalf of and at the direction of the
registered voter, mark and sign the absent ballot. If the person
marks and signs the absent ballot, the person must:
(a) Indicate next to his or her signature that the absent ballot
has been marked and signed on behalf of the registered voter; and
(b) Submit a written statement with the absent ballot that
includes the name, address and signature of the person.
6. An absent ballot prepared by or on behalf of the registered
voter pursuant to this section must be mailed or delivered to the
county clerk in accordance with section 16 of this act.
7. The procedure authorized by this section is subject to all
other provisions of this chapter relating to voting by absent ballot
to the extent that those provisions are not inconsistent with the
provisions of this section.
Sec. 15. 1. A registered voter who provides sufficient
written notice to the appropriate county clerk may request that the
registered voter receive an absent ballot for all elections at which
the registered voter is eligible to vote.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, upon receipt
of a request submitted by a registered voter pursuant to subsection
1, the county clerk shall:
(a) Issue an absent ballot to the registered voter for each
primary election, presidential preference primary election, general
election and special election other than a special city election that
is conducted after the date the written statement is submitted to the
county clerk.
(b) Inform the applicable city clerk of receipt of the written
statement. Upon receipt of the notice from the county clerk, the
city clerk shall issue an absent ballot for each primary city
election, general city election and special city election that is
conducted after the date the city clerk receives notice from the
county clerk.
3. If, at the direction of a registered voter with a physical
disability or who is at least 65 years of age, a person:
(a) Marks and signs an absent ballot issued to the registered
voter pursuant to the provisions of this section on behalf of the
registered voter, the person must:
(1) Indicate next to his or her signature that the ballot has
been marked and signed on behalf of the registered voter; and
(2) Submit a written statement with the absent ballot that
includes the name, address and signature of the person.
(b) Assists the registered voter to mark and sign an absent
ballot issued to the registered voter pursuant to the provisions of
this section, the person or registered voter must submit a written
-
*AB228*

– 9 –
statement with the absent ballot that includes the name, address
and signature of the person.
4. A county clerk may not mail an absent ballot requested by
a registered voter pursuant to subsection 1 if, after the request is
submitted:
(a) The registered voter is designated inactive pursuant to
NRS 293.530;
(b) The county clerk cancels the registration of the person
pursuant to NRS 293.530, 293.535 or 293.540; or
(c) An absent ballot is returned to the county clerk as
undeliverable, unless the registered voter has submitted a new
request pursuant to subsection 1.
5. The procedure authorized pursuant to this section is
subject to all other provisions of this chapter relating to voting by
absent ballot to the extent that those provisions are not
inconsistent with the provisions of this section.
Sec. 16. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
absent ballots must be:
(a) Delivered by hand to the county clerk before the time set
for closing of the polls pursuant to NRS 293.273; or
(b) Mailed to the county clerk, and:
(1) Postmarked at least 3 days before the day of the
election; and
(2) Received by the county clerk within the period for the
counting of absent ballots pursuant to subsection 2 of section 21
of this act.
2. If an absent ballot is received not more than 3 days after
the day of the election and the date of the postmark cannot be
determined, the absent ballot shall be deemed to have been
postmarked at least 3 days before the day of the election.
Sec. 17. The county clerk shall determine before issuing an
absent ballot that the person who requested the absent ballot is a
registered voter in the proper county.
Sec. 18. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2
and chapter 293D of NRS, if the request for an absent ballot is
properly made, the county clerk shall, as soon as the absent ballot
for the precinct or district in which the voter resides has been
prepared pursuant to section 9 of this act, send to the voter by
first-class mail, or by any class of mail if the Official Election
Mail logo or an equivalent logo or mark created by the United
States Postal Service is properly placed on the absent ballot:
(a) An absent ballot;
(b) A return envelope, which must include, without limitation,
a flap to cover the signature and identifying numbers of the voter
required to be written on the return envelope;
-
*AB228*

– 10 –
(c) An envelope or similar device into which the ballot is
inserted to ensure its secrecy;
(d) An identification envelope, if applicable; and
(e) Instructions.
2. If the county clerk fails to send an absent ballot pursuant
to subsection 1 to a voter who resides within the continental
United States, the county clerk may use approved electronic
transmission to send an absent ballot and instructions to the voter.
The voter may mail or deliver the absent ballot to the county clerk
in a manner authorized by law or submit the absent ballot by
approved electronic transmission.
3. The return envelope sent pursuant to subsection 1 must
include postage prepaid by first-class mail if the absent voter is
within the boundaries of the United States, its territories or
possessions or on a military base.
4. Nothing may be enclosed or sent with an absent ballot
except as required by subsection 1 or 2 and chapter 293D of NRS.
5. Before depositing an absent ballot in the mail or sending
an absent ballot by approved electronic transmission, the county
clerk shall record:
(a) The date the absent ballot is issued;
(b) The name of the absent voter to whom the absent ballot is
issued, his or her precinct or district and his or her political
affiliation, if any, unless all the offices on the absent ballot are
nonpartisan offices;
(c) The number of the absent ballot; and
(d) Any remarks the county clerk finds appropriate.
6. The Secretary of State shall adopt regulations to carry out
the provisions of subsection 2.
Sec. 19. 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
293.269951 and 293D.200, when an absent ballot is returned by
an absent voter to the county clerk through the mail, by facsimile
machine or other approved electronic transmission or in person,
and record of its return is made in the absent ballot record for the
election, the county clerk or an employee in the office of the
county clerk shall:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), verify that
the last four digits of the driver’s license number or social security
number, as applicable, written on the return envelope match the
information of the voter in the records of the county clerk;
(b) If the voter has written the identification number issued by
the county clerk pursuant to NRS 293.507, verify that the
identification number matches the information of the voter in the
records of the county clerk; and
-
*AB228*

– 11 –
(c) Check the signature used for the absent ballot against all
signatures of the absent voter available in the records of the
county clerk.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, if the county
clerk determines pursuant to subsection 1 that the absent voter is
entitled to cast the absent ballot and:
(a) No absent ballot central counting board has been
appointed, the county clerk shall neatly stack, unopened, the
absent ballot with any other absent ballot received that day in a
container and deliver, or cause to be delivered, that container to
the appropriate election board.
(b) An absent ballot central counting board has been
appointed, the county clerk shall deposit the absent ballot in the
proper ballot box or place the absent ballot, unopened, in a
container that must be securely locked or under the control of the
county clerk at all times. At the end of each day before election
day, the county clerk may remove the absent ballots from each
ballot box, neatly stack the absent ballots in a container and seal
the container with a numbered seal. Not earlier than 4 working
days before the election, the county clerk shall deliver the absent
ballots to the absent ballot central counting board to be processed
and prepared for counting pursuant to the procedures established
by the Secretary of State to ensure the confidentiality of the
prepared ballots until after the polls have closed pursuant to NRS
293.273 or 293.305.
3. If the county clerk determines when checking the signature
of the absent voter pursuant to subsection 1 that the absent voter
did not include the necessary information or sign the return
envelope but is otherwise entitled to cast the absent ballot, the
county clerk shall contact the absent voter and advise the voter of
the procedures to provide the necessary information or a
signature. For the absent ballot to be counted, the absent voter
must provide a signature within the period for the counting of
absent ballots pursuant to subsection 2 of section 21 of this act.
Sec. 20. 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
293.269951, chapter 293D of NRS and subsection 2 of section 18
of this act, to vote an absent ballot, the voter must:
(a) Mark and fold the absent ballot;
(b) Deposit the absent ballot in the return envelope and seal
the return envelope;
(c) Affix his or her signature on the return envelope in the
space provided for the signature;
(d) Write in the space provided on the return envelope one of
the following:
-
*AB228*

– 12 –
(1) The last four digits of his or her driver’s license number
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles;
(2) If the voter does not have a driver’s license number
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles, the last four digits of
his or her social security number; or
(3) If the voter does not have a driver’s license number
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles or a social security
number, the identification number issued by the county clerk
pursuant to NRS 293.507;
(e) Close the attached flap over the signature and identifying
numbers written on the return envelope; and
(f) Mail or deliver the return envelope in a manner authorized
by law.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, if a
registered voter who has requested an absent ballot applies to vote
the absent ballot in person at:
(a) The office of the county clerk, the voter must vote the
absent ballot in the same manner as provided in subsection 1, and
deliver the envelope to the county clerk.
(b) A polling place, including, without limitation, a polling
place for early voting, the voter must surrender the absent ballot
and provide proof of identity before being issued a ballot to vote at
the polling place. A person who receives a surrendered absent
ballot shall mark it “Cancelled.”
3. If a registered voter who has requested an absent ballot by
mail applies to vote in person at the office of the county clerk or a
polling place, including, without limitation, a polling place for
early voting, and the voter does not have the absent ballot to
deliver or surrender, the voter must be issued a ballot to vote if the
voter:
(a) Provides proof of identity;
(b) Is a registered voter who is otherwise entitled to vote; and
(c) Signs an affirmation under penalty of perjury on a form
prepared by the Secretary of State declaring that the registered
voter has not voted during the election.
4. Except as otherwise provided in sections 14 and 15 of this
act, it is unlawful for any person to return an absent ballot other
than the registered voter who requested the absent ballot or, at the
request of the voter, a member of the immediate family of the
registered voter. A person who returns an absent ballot and who is
a member of the immediate family of the registered voter who
requested the absent ballot:
(a) Shall, under penalty of perjury, indicate on a form
prescribed by the county clerk that the person is a member of the
immediate family of the registered voter who requested the absent
-
*AB228*

– 13 –
ballot and that the registered voter requested that the person
return the absent ballot; and
(b) Shall not return more than two absent ballots belonging to
a member of the person’s immediate family for any election.
5. A person who violates the provisions of subsection 4 is
guilty of a category E felony and shall be punished as provided in
NRS 193.130.
Sec. 21. 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
293.269951 and 293D.200, on the day of an election, the election
boards receiving the absent ballots from the county clerk shall,
in the presence of a majority of the election board officers, remove
the absent ballots from the ballot box and the containers in which
the absent ballots were transported pursuant to section 19 of this
act and deposit the absent ballots in the regular ballot box in the
following manner:
(a) The name of the absent voter, as shown on the return
envelope or approved electronic transmission, must be checked as
if the absent voter were voting in person;
(b) If the board determines that the absent voter is entitled to
cast the absent ballot, the return envelope must be opened, the
numbers on the absent ballot and return envelope or approved
electronic transmission compared, the number strip or stub
detached from the absent ballot, and, if the numbers are the same,
the absent ballot deposited in the regular ballot box; and
(c) The election board officers shall indicate the roster
“Voted” by the name of the absent voter.
2. The board must complete the count of all absent ballots on
or before the seventh day following the election.
Sec. 22. When all absent ballots delivered to the elections
boards have been voted or rejected, except as otherwise provided
in NRS 293.269951 and 293D.200, the empty envelopes and the
envelopes and approved electronic transmissions containing
rejected absent ballots must be returned to the county clerk. On all
envelopes and approved electronic transmissions containing
rejected absent ballots, the cause of rejection must be noted and
the envelope or approved electronic transmission and signed by a
majority of the election board officers.
Sec. 23. 1. In counties in which an absent ballot central
counting board is appointed, the county clerk shall provide a
ballot box in the county clerk’s office for each different ballot
listing in the county.
2. On each such box there must appear a statement
indicating the precincts and district for which such box has been
designated.
-
*AB228*

– 14 –
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.269951 and
293D.200, each absent ballot voted must be deposited in a ballot
box according to the precinct or district of the absent voter voting
such absent ballot.
Sec. 24. An error in the information included by a registered
voter in a form to request an absent ballot does not constitute
grounds for rejecting an absent ballot cast by the absent voter.
Sec. 25. 1. Not earlier than 4 working days before the
election, the counting board, if it is responsible for counting
absent ballots, or the absent ballot central counting board shall
withdraw all the absent ballots from each ballot box or container
that holds absent ballots received before that day and ascertain
that each box or container has the required number of absent
ballots according to the county clerk’s absent ballot record for the
election.
2. The counting board or absent ballot central counting
board shall count the number of absent ballots in the same
manner as election boards.
Sec. 26. 1. Each day after the initial withdrawal of the
absent ballots pursuant to section 25 of this act and before the day
of the election, the counting board, if it is responsible for counting
absent ballots, or the absent ballot central counting board shall
withdraw from the appropriate ballot boxes or containers all the
absent ballots received the previous day and ascertain that each
box or container has the required number of absent ballots
according to the county clerk’s absent ballot record for the
election.
2. If any absent ballots are received by the county clerk on
election day pursuant to section 14 of this act, the county clerk
shall deposit the absent ballots in the appropriate ballot boxes or
containers.
3. Not earlier than 4 working days before the election, the
appropriate board shall, in public, count the votes cast on the
absent ballots.
4. If paper ballots are used, the results of the absent ballot
vote in each precinct must be certified and submitted to the county
clerk who shall have the results added to the regular votes of the
precinct. The returns of absent ballots must be reported separately
from the regular votes of the precinct, unless reporting the returns
separately would violate the secrecy of a voter’s ballot. The county
clerks shall develop a procedure to ensure that each ballot is kept
secret.
5. Any person who disseminates to the public in any way
information pertaining to the count of absent ballots before the
polls close is guilty of a misdemeanor.
-
*AB228*

– 15 –
Sec. 27. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall issue an
identification card at no charge to a person who:
1. Is a registered voter of this State;
2. Does not possess a form of proof of identity described in
section 4 of this act;
3. Attests that he or she is experiencing financial hardship;
and
4. Submits an application pursuant to NRS 483.850 and
section 28 of this act.
Sec. 28. 1. A person who wishes to obtain an identification
card at no charge pursuant to section 27 of this act must, in
addition to the requirements of NRS 483.850, submit to the
Department of Motor Vehicles:
(a) Proof that the applicant is a registered voter of this State;
and
(b) An attestation that he or she is experiencing financial
hardship.
2. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall not require a
person who submits an application pursuant to this section to
provide proof of financial hardship.
Sec. 29. NRS 293.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.010 As used in this title, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 293.016 to 293.121,
inclusive, and sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 30. NRS 293.093 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.093 “Regular votes” means the votes cast by registered
voters, except votes cast by:
1. [A mail] An absent ballot;
2. A provisional ballot pursuant to NRS 293.3078 to 293.3086,
inclusive; or
3. A provisional ballot pursuant to NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887,
inclusive.
Sec. 31. NRS 293.177 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.177 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.165
and 293.166, a name may not be printed on a ballot to be used at a
primary election unless the person named has filed a declaration of
candidacy with the appropriate filing officer and paid the filing fee
required by NRS 293.193 not earlier than:
(a) For a candidate for judicial office, the first Monday in
January of the year in which the election is to be held and not later
than 5 p.m. on the second Friday after the first Monday in January;
and
-
*AB228*

– 16 –
(b) For all other candidates, the first Monday in March of the
year in which the election is to be held and not later than 5 p.m. on
the second Friday after the first Monday in March.
2. A declaration of candidacy required to be filed pursuant to
this chapter must be in substantially the following form:
(a) For partisan office:

DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY OF ........ FOR THE
OFFICE OF ................

State of Nevada

County of ........................

For the purpose of having my name placed on the official
ballot as a candidate for the ................ Party nomination for
the office of ........., I, the undersigned ........, do swear or
affirm under penalty of perjury that I actually, as opposed to
constructively, reside at .........., in the City or Town of .......,
County of .........., State of Nevada; that my actual, as opposed
to constructive, residence in the State, district, county,
township, city or other area prescribed by law to which the
office pertains began on a date at least 30 days immediately
preceding the date of the close of filing of declarations of
candidacy for this office; that my telephone number is
............, and the address at which I receive mail, if different
than my residence, is .........; that I am registered as a member
of the ................ Party; that I am a qualified elector pursuant
to Section 1 of Article 2 of the Constitution of the State of
Nevada; that if I have ever been convicted of treason or a
felony, my civil rights have been restored; that I have not, in
violation of the provisions of NRS 293.176, changed the
designation of my political party or political party affiliation
on an official application to register to vote in any state since
December 31 before the closing filing date for this election;
that I generally believe in and intend to support the concepts
found in the principles and policies of that political party in
the coming election; that if nominated as a candidate of the
................ Party at the ensuing election, I will accept that
nomination and not withdraw; that I will not knowingly
violate any election law or any law defining and prohibiting
corrupt and fraudulent practices in campaigns and elections in
this State; that I will qualify for the office if elected thereto,
including, but not limited to, complying with any limitation
prescribed by the Constitution and laws of this State
-
*AB228*

– 17 –
concerning the number of years or terms for which a person
may hold the office; that I understand that knowingly and
willfully filing a declaration of candidacy which contains a
false statement is a crime punishable as a gross misdemeanor
and also subjects me to a civil action disqualifying me from
entering upon the duties of the office; and that I understand
that my name will appear on all ballots as designated in this
declaration.

........................................................
(Designation of name)

........................................................
(Signature of candidate for office)

Subscribed and sworn to before me
this ...... day of the month of ...... of the year ......

...................................................................
Notary Public or other person
authorized to administer an oath

(b) For nonpartisan office:

DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY OF ........ FOR THE
OFFICE OF ................

State of Nevada

County of ........................

For the purpose of having my name placed on the official
ballot as a candidate for the office of ................, I, the
undersigned ................, do swear or affirm under penalty of
perjury that I actually, as opposed to constructively, reside at
........., in the City or Town of ......., County of ........., State of
Nevada; that my actual, as opposed to constructive, residence
in the State, district, county, township, city or other area
prescribed by law to which the office pertains began on a date
at least 30 days immediately preceding the date of the close
of filing of declarations of candidacy for this office; that my
telephone number is ..........., and the address at which I
receive mail, if different than my residence, is ..........; that I
am a qualified elector pursuant to Section 1 of Article 2 of the
Constitution of the State of Nevada; that if I have ever been
-
*AB228*

– 18 –
convicted of treason or a felony, my civil rights have been
restored; that if nominated as a nonpartisan candidate at the
ensuing election, I will accept the nomination and not
withdraw; that I will not knowingly violate any election law
or any law defining and prohibiting corrupt and fraudulent
practices in campaigns and elections in this State; that I will
qualify for the office if elected thereto, including, but not
limited to, complying with any limitation prescribed by the
Constitution and laws of this State concerning the number of
years or terms for which a person may hold the office; that I
understand that knowingly and willfully filing a declaration
of candidacy which contains a false statement is a crime
punishable as a gross misdemeanor and also subjects me to a
civil action disqualifying me from entering upon the duties of
the office; and that I understand that my name will appear on
all ballots as designated in this declaration.

........................................................
(Designation of name)

........................................................
(Signature of candidate for office)

Subscribed and sworn to before me
this ...... day of the month of ...... of the year ......

...................................................................
Notary Public or other person
authorized to administer an oath

3. The address of a candidate which must be included in the
declaration of candidacy pursuant to subsection 2 must be the street
address of the residence where the candidate actually, as opposed to
constructively, resides in accordance with NRS 281.050, if one has
been assigned. The declaration of candidacy must not be accepted
for filing if the candidate fails to comply with the following
provisions of this subsection or, if applicable, the provisions of
subsection 4:
(a) The candidate shall not list the candidate’s address as a post
office box unless a street address has not been assigned to his or her
residence; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the candidate
shall present to the filing officer:
-
*AB228*

– 19 –
(1) A valid driver’s license or identification card issued by a
governmental agency that contains a photograph of the candidate
and the candidate’s residential address; or
(2) A current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck, or
document issued by a governmental entity, including a check which
indicates the candidate’s name and residential address, but not
including a voter registration card.
4. If the candidate executes an oath or affirmation under
penalty of perjury stating that the candidate is unable to present to
the filing officer the proof of residency required by subsection 3
because a street address has not been assigned to the candidate’s
residence or because the rural or remote location of the candidate’s
residence makes it impracticable to present the proof of residency
required by subsection 3, the candidate shall present to the filing
officer:
(a) A valid driver’s license or identification card issued by a
governmental agency that contains a photograph of the candidate;
and
(b) Alternative proof of the candidate’s residential address that
the filing officer determines is sufficient to verify where the
candidate actually, as opposed to constructively, resides in
accordance with NRS 281.050. The Secretary of State may adopt
regulations establishing the forms of alternative proof of the
candidate’s residential address that the filing officer may accept to
verify where the candidate actually, as opposed to constructively,
resides in accordance with NRS 281.050.
5. The filing officer shall retain a copy of the documents and
proof of [identity and] residency provided by the candidate pursuant
to subsection 3 or 4. Such a copy:
(a) May not be withheld from the public; and
(b) Must not contain the social security number, driver’s license
or identification card number or account number of the candidate.
6. By filing the declaration of candidacy, the candidate shall be
deemed to have appointed the filing officer for the office as his or
her agent for service of process for the purposes of a proceeding
pursuant to NRS 293.182. Service of such process must first be
attempted at the appropriate address as specified by the candidate in
the declaration of candidacy. If the candidate cannot be served at
that address, service must be made by personally delivering to and
leaving with the filing officer duplicate copies of the process. The
filing officer shall immediately send, by registered or certified mail,
one of the copies to the candidate at the specified address, unless the
candidate has designated in writing to the filing officer a different
address for that purpose, in which case the filing officer shall mail
the copy to the last address so designated.
-
*AB228*

– 20 –
7. If the filing officer receives credible evidence indicating that
a candidate has been convicted of a felony and has not had his or her
civil rights restored, the filing officer:
(a) May conduct an investigation to determine whether the
candidate has been convicted of a felony and, if so, whether the
candidate has had his or her civil rights restored; and
(b) Shall transmit the credible evidence and the findings from
such investigation to the Attorney General, if the filing officer is the
Secretary of State, or to the district attorney, if the filing officer is a
person other than the Secretary of State.
8. The receipt of information by the Attorney General or
district attorney pursuant to subsection 7 must be treated as a
challenge of a candidate pursuant to subsections 4 and 5 of NRS
293.182 to which the provisions of NRS 293.2045 apply.
9. Any person who knowingly and willfully files a declaration
of candidacy which contains a false statement in violation of this
section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
Sec. 32. NRS 293.217 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.217 1. The county clerk of each county shall appoint and
notify registered voters to act as election board officers for the
various polling places in the county as provided in NRS 293.220 to
293.227, inclusive, and [NRS 293.269929.] sections 5, 6 and 25 of
this act. The registered voters appointed as election board officers
for any polling place must not all be of the same political party. No
candidate for nomination or election or a relative of the candidate
within the second degree of consanguinity or affinity may be
appointed as an election board officer. Immediately after election
board officers are appointed, if requested by the county clerk, the
sheriff shall:
(a) Appoint a deputy sheriff for each polling place in the county
and for the central election board or the [mail] absent ballot central
counting board; or
(b) Deputize as a deputy sheriff for the election an election
board officer of each polling place in the county and for the central
election board or the [mail] absent ballot central counting board.
The deputized officer shall receive no additional compensation for
services rendered as a deputy sheriff during the election for which
the officer is deputized.
 Deputy sheriffs so appointed and deputized shall preserve order
during hours of voting and attend closing of the polls.
2. The county clerk may appoint a trainee for the position of
election board officer as set forth in NRS 293.2175.
-
*AB228*

– 21 –
Sec. 33. NRS 293.250 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.250 1. Except as otherwise provided in chapter 293D of
NRS, the Secretary of State shall, in a manner consistent with the
election laws of this State, prescribe:
(a) The form of all ballots, [mail] absent ballots, diagrams,
sample ballots, certificates, notices, declarations, applications to
preregister and register to vote, lists, applications, registers, rosters,
statements and abstracts required by the election laws of this State.
(b) The procedures to be followed and the requirements of:
(1) The system established by the Secretary of State pursuant
to NRS 293.671 for using a computer to register voters.
(2) The use of the system of approved electronic
transmission established pursuant to NRS 293D.200 by electors and
voters with disabilities pursuant to NRS 293.269951.
2. Except as otherwise provided in chapter 293D of NRS, the
Secretary of State shall prescribe with respect to the matter to be
printed on every kind of ballot:
(a) The placement and listing of all offices, candidates and
measures upon which voting is statewide, which must be uniform
throughout the State.
(b) The listing of all other candidates required to file with the
Secretary of State, and the order of listing all offices, candidates and
measures upon which voting is not statewide, from which each
county or city clerk shall prepare appropriate ballot forms for use in
any election in his or her county.
3. The Secretary of State shall place the condensation of each
proposed constitutional amendment or statewide measure near the
spaces or devices for indicating the voter’s choice.
4. The fiscal note for, explanation of, arguments for and
against, and rebuttals to such arguments of each proposed
constitutional amendment or statewide measure must be included on
all sample ballots.
5. The condensations and explanations for constitutional
amendments and statewide measures proposed by initiative or
referendum must be prepared by the Secretary of State, upon
consultation with the Attorney General. The arguments and rebuttals
for or against constitutional amendments and statewide measures
proposed by initiative or referendum must be prepared in the
manner set forth in NRS 293.252. The fiscal notes for constitutional
amendments and statewide measures proposed by initiative or
referendum must be prepared by the Secretary of State, upon
consultation with the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau. The condensations, explanations, arguments,
rebuttals and fiscal notes must be in easily understood language and
of reasonable length, and whenever feasible must be completed by
-
*AB228*

– 22 –
August 1 of the year in which the general election is to be held. The
explanations must include a digest. The digest must include a
concise and clear summary of any existing laws directly related to
the constitutional amendment or statewide measure and a summary
of how the constitutional amendment or statewide measure adds to,
changes or repeals such existing laws. For a constitutional
amendment or statewide measure that creates, generates, increases
or decreases any public revenue in any form, the first paragraph of
the digest must include a statement that the constitutional
amendment or statewide measure creates, generates, increases or
decreases, as applicable, public revenue.
6. The names of candidates for township and legislative or
special district offices must be printed only on the ballots furnished
to voters of that township or district.
7. A county clerk:
(a) May divide paper ballots into two sheets in a manner which
provides a clear understanding and grouping of all measures and
candidates.
(b) Shall prescribe the color or colors of the ballots and voting
receipts used in any election which the clerk is required to conduct.
Sec. 34. NRS 293.2693 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.2693 If a county or city uses paper ballots, including,
without limitation, for [mail] absent ballots, the county or city clerk
shall provide a voter education program specific to the voting
system used by the county or city. The voter education program
must include, without limitation, information concerning the effect
of overvoting and the procedures for correcting a vote on a ballot
before it is cast and counted and for obtaining a replacement ballot.
Sec. 35. NRS 293.2694 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.2694 1. The Secretary of State may enter into one or
more contracts for the purchase of all ballots, including, without
limitation, [mail] absent ballots, and return envelopes for use in any
statewide and local election held in this State pursuant to title 24 of
NRS. Such a contract is subject to the provisions of chapter 333 of
NRS.
2. Each board of county commissioners and governing body of
an incorporated city in this State may elect to use the ballots,
including, without limitation, [mail] absent ballots, and return
envelopes purchased by the Secretary of State in accordance with
the contract or contracts entered into pursuant to this section for all
statewide and local elections held in a given year in this State
pursuant to title 24 of NRS by notifying the Secretary of State in
writing not less than 8 months before the date of the presidential
preference primary election in a presidential election year or the
date of the primary election in any other election year.
-
*AB228*

– 23 –
3. If a contract or contracts entered into pursuant to this section
requires the vendor to distribute [mail] absent ballots on behalf of a
county or city clerk, the contract or contracts must require the
vendor to deposit the [mail] absent ballots for mailing at a location
within this State.
Sec. 36. NRS 293.269951 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.269951 1. The Secretary of State shall allow:
(a) The following electors to use the system of approved
electronic transmission established pursuant to NRS 293D.200 to
register to vote in every election where the system of approved
electronic transmission is available to a covered voter to register to
vote:
(1) An elector with a disability; and
(2) An elector who is a tribal member and who resides on an
Indian reservation or Indian colony.
(b) The following registered voters to use the system of
approved electronic transmission established pursuant to NRS
293D.200 to apply for and cast [a] an absent ballot in every election
where the system of approved electronic transmission is available to
a covered voter to request and cast a military-overseas ballot:
(1) A registered voter with a disability; and
(2) A registered voter who is a tribal member and who
resides on an Indian reservation or Indian colony.
2. The deadline to use the system of approved electronic
transmission:
(a) To register to vote for an elector pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 is the same as the deadline set forth in NRS 293D.230
for a covered voter to register to vote.
(b) To apply for a ballot for a registered voter pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1, is the same as the deadline set forth in
NRS 293D.310 for a covered voter to request and cast a military-
overseas ballot.
(c) To cast [a] an absent ballot for a registered voter pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1, is the same as the deadline set forth in
NRS 293D.400 for a covered voter to request and cast a military-
overseas ballot.
3. Upon receipt of an application and absent ballot cast by a
person authorized pursuant to subsection 1 to use the system of
approved electronic transmission established pursuant to NRS
293D.200, the local elections official shall affix, mark or otherwise
acknowledge receipt of the application and absent ballot by means
of a time stamp on the application.
4. The Secretary of State shall ensure that a person who is
authorized pursuant to subsection 1 may provide his or her digital
-
*AB228*

– 24 –
signature or electronic signature on any document or other material
that is necessary for the elector or registered voter to register to vote,
apply for [a] an absent ballot or cast [a] an absent ballot, as
applicable.
5. The Secretary of State shall prescribe the form and content
of a declaration for use by a person authorized pursuant to
subsection 1 to swear or affirm specific representations pertaining to
identity, eligibility to vote, status as such an elector or registered
voter and timely and proper completion of [a] an absent ballot.
6. The Secretary of State shall prescribe the duties of the
county clerk upon receipt of a ballot sent by a registered voter
authorized pursuant to subsection 1 to use the system of approved
electronic transmission, including, without limitation, the
procedures to be used in accepting, handling and counting the
absent ballot.
7. The Secretary of State shall make available to a person
authorized pursuant to subsection 1 information regarding
instructions on using the system for approved electronic
transmission to register to vote and apply for and cast [a] an absent
ballot.
8. The Secretary of State shall adopt any regulation necessary
to carry out the provisions of this section.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Covered voter” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 293D.030.
(b) “Digital signature” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 720.060.
(c) “Electronic signature” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 719.100.
(d) “Military-overseas ballot” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 293D.050.
Sec. 37. NRS 293.269971 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.269971 1. Each person who administers a county or city
jail shall establish a policy that ensures that:
(a) A person who is detained in the jail and is a registered voter
may vote in each primary election, presidential preference primary
election, primary city election, general election and general city
election in which the person is eligible to vote; and
(b) A person who is detained in the jail and is a qualified elector
may register to vote in each primary election, presidential
preference primary election, primary city election, general election
and general city election in which the person is eligible to register to
vote.
-
*AB228*

– 25 –
2. If qualified electors or registered voters of a county are
detained in a jail or facility located in another county pursuant to an
agreement entered into pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 211.010,
the county clerk shall coordinate with the person who administers
the jail in the county where such qualified electors or registered
voters are detained to establish a procedure for those persons to
register to vote and vote.
3. Each policy or procedure established pursuant to subsection
1 or 2, as applicable, must:
(a) Be developed in coordination with the county clerk and, if
applicable, the city clerk;
(b) Be consistent with the provisions of this title relating to
elections;
(c) Ensure the safety of any election board officer or other
person who assists in the conduct of registering to vote or voting at
the jail;
(d) Ensure that a person who registers to vote or votes in a jail
may do so without coercion or intimidation;
(e) Ensure the secrecy of the ballot, including, without
limitation, the [mail] absent ballot; and
(f) Set forth a process that allows for same-day voter registration
and allows a family member of a person detained in the jail
to provide the person in the jail with the necessary information to
register to vote on the day of the election pursuant to
NRS 293.5847.
4. Each county or city jail shall post in a prominent location
and set forth in the handbook for detained persons information
relating to elections and voting in the jail, including, without
limitation, qualifications to register to vote and to vote and the
options and procedures for registering to vote and voting at the jail.
5. Nothing in this section authorizes a person convicted of a
felony in this State who has not had his or her right to vote restored
pursuant to NRS 213.157 to vote or to register to vote.
6. The Secretary of State shall adopt regulations to carry out
the provisions of this section.
Sec. 38. NRS 293.269973 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.269973 1. Each county or city jail shall:
(a) Provide each person detained in the jail with a reasonable
amount of privacy to vote, which may, without limitation, be in a
common area, visitation area, room or cell;
(b) Provide each person detained in the jail with a pen with
black or blue ink to vote his or her [mail] absent ballot;
(c) Allow the county clerk to establish a process for the
collection of the [mail] absent ballots voted by persons detained in
-
*AB228*

– 26 –
the jail that includes a method for documenting the chain of custody
of [mail] absent ballots; and
(d) If applicable, allow the person to cure any defect in the
signature or necessary information on [a mail] an absent ballot
pursuant to [NRS 293.269927.] section 19 of this act.
2. A county or city jail shall not open [a mail] an absent ballot
after a prisoner has voted and sealed the [mail] absent ballot.
Sec. 39. NRS 293.272 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.272 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 and
in NRS 293.2725 and 293.3083, a person who registered by mail or
computer to vote shall, for the first election in which the person
votes at which that registration is valid, vote in person unless he or
she has previously voted in the county in which he or she is
registered to vote.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to a person who:
(a) Is entitled to vote otherwise than in person pursuant to
federal law or chapter 293D of NRS [;] or section 14 of this act;
(b) Is disabled;
(c) Is provided the right to vote otherwise than in person
pursuant to the Voting Accessibility for the Elderly and
Handicapped Act, 52 U.S.C. §§ 20101 et seq.; [or]
(d) [Is sent a mail ballot pursuant to the provisions of NRS
293.269913 and includes a copy of the information required
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 293.2725 with his
or her voted mail ballot, if required pursuant to NRS 293.269915.]
Submits or has previously submitted a written request for an
absent ballot that is signed by the registered voter before a notary
public or other person authorized to administer an oath; or
(e) Requests an absent ballot in person at the office of the
county clerk.
Sec. 40. NRS 293.2725 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.2725 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, in
NRS 293.3081, 293.3083 and 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive, and
in federal law, in addition to any other requirement to vote, a
person who registers to vote by mail or computer or is registered to
vote by an automatic voter registration agency, or a person who
preregisters to vote by mail or computer and is subsequently deemed
to be registered to vote, and who has not previously voted in an
election for federal office in this State:
(a) May vote at a polling place only if the person presents to the
election board officer at the polling place:
(1) A current and valid photo identification of the person,
which shows his or her physical address; or
(2) A copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck,
or document issued by a governmental entity, including a check
-
*AB228*

– 27 –
which indicates the name and address of the person, but not
including a voter registration card; and
(b) May vote by mail only if the person provides to the county
or city clerk:
(1) A copy of a current and valid photo identification of the
person, which shows his or her physical address; or
(2) A copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck,
or document issued by a governmental entity, including a check
which indicates the name and address of the person, but not
including a voter registration card.
 If there is a question as to the physical address of the person, the
election board officer or clerk may request additional information.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to a person who:
(a) Registers to vote by mail or computer, or preregisters to vote
by mail or computer and is subsequently deemed to be registered to
vote, and submits with an application to preregister or register to
vote:
(1) A copy of a current and valid photo identification; or
(2) A copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck,
or document issued by a governmental entity, including a check
which indicates the name and address of the person, but not
including a voter registration card;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, registers to
vote by mail or computer and submits with an application to register
to vote a driver’s license number or at least the last four digits of his
or her social security number, if a state or local election official has
matched that information with an existing identification record
bearing the same number, name and date of birth as provided by the
person in the application;
(c) Registers to vote pursuant to NRS 293.5768 to 293.57699,
inclusive, and at that time presents to the automatic voter
registration agency:
(1) A copy of a current and valid photo identification;
(2) A copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck
or document issued by a governmental entity, including a check
which indicates the name and address of the person, but not
including a voter registration card; or
(3) A driver’s license number or at least the last four digits of
his or her social security number, if a state or local election official
has matched that information with an existing identification record
bearing the same number, name and date of birth as provided by the
person in the application;
(d) Is entitled to vote an absent ballot pursuant to the Uniformed
and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 52 U.S.C. §§ 20301 et
seq.;
-
*AB228*

– 28 –
(e) Is provided the right to vote otherwise than in person under
the Voting Accessibility for the Elderly and Handicapped Act, 52
U.S.C. §§ 20101 et seq.; or
(f) Is entitled to vote otherwise than in person under any other
federal law.
3. The provisions of subsection 1 apply to a person described
in paragraph (b) of subsection 2 if the voter registration card issued
to the person is mailed by the county clerk to the person and
returned to the county clerk by the United States Postal Service.
Sec. 41. NRS 293.2733 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.2733 1. If an Indian reservation or Indian colony is
located in whole or in part within a county, the county clerk:
(a) Shall, except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and 5,
establish within the boundaries of the Indian reservation or Indian
colony at a location approved by the Indian tribe for the day of a
primary election, presidential preference primary election or general
election a polling place ; [and a ballot drop box;] and
(b) May establish additional polling places [or ballot drop boxes,
or both,] within the boundaries of the Indian reservation or Indian
colony for the day of a primary election, presidential preference
primary election or general election upon the request of an Indian
tribe submitted not later than the dates set forth in subsection 2 to
elect not to have a polling place [and ballot drop box] established
within the boundaries of the Indian reservation or Indian colony.
2. An Indian tribe may elect not to have a polling place [and
ballot drop box] established within the boundaries of an Indian
reservation or Indian colony for the day of a primary election,
presidential preference primary election or general election by
submitting notice to the county clerk on or before:
(a) If the notice is for a primary election, January 15 of the year
in which the primary election is to be held.
(b) If the notice is for a presidential preference primary election,
September 15 of the year immediately preceding the year of the
presidential preference primary election.
(c) If the notice is for a general election, June 15 of the year in
which the general election is to be held.
3. Any location of a polling place [or ballot drop box]
established pursuant to subsection 1 must satisfy the criteria the
county clerk uses for the establishment of any other polling place ,
[and ballot drop box,] as applicable.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the county
clerk must continue to establish one polling place [and ballot drop
box] within the boundaries of the Indian reservation or Indian
colony at a location approved by the Indian tribe for the day of any
future primary election, presidential preference primary election or
-
*AB228*

– 29 –
general election unless otherwise notified by the Indian tribe
pursuant to subsection 2.
5. Not later than the dates set forth in subsection 2 to elect not
to have a polling place [and ballot drop box] established within the
boundaries of the Indian reservation or Indian colony, an Indian
tribe that elects to have a polling place [and ballot drop box]
established must submit to the county clerk and the tribal liaison
designated by the Office of the Secretary of State pursuant to
NRS 233A.260:
(a) The location for the polling place ; [and ballot drop box and
whether the location will have only a polling place or ballot drop
box or both a polling place and ballot drop box;]
(b) Whether the Indian tribe will select registered voters to be
appointed to act as election board officers to staff the polling place
within the boundaries of the Indian reservation or Indian colony;
and
(c) The proposed days and hours for the operation of the polling
place.
 If an Indian tribe does not submit the information required
pursuant to this subsection, the Indian tribe shall be deemed to have
elected not to have a polling place [and ballot drop box] established
within the boundaries of the Indian reservation or Indian colony.
Sec. 42. NRS 293.277 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.277 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.283,
293.541, 293.57691 and 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive, if a
person’s name appears in the roster or if the person provides an
affirmation pursuant to NRS 293.525, the person is entitled to vote
and must [sign] :
(a) Present proof of identity; and
(b) Sign his or her name in the roster or on a signature card
when he or she applies to vote. The signature must be compared by
an election board officer with the signature or a facsimile thereof on
the person’s application to register to vote or [one of the forms of
identification listed in subsection 2.] on his or her proof of identity.
2. [Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.2725, the forms
of identification which may be used individually to identify a voter
at the polling place are:
(a) The voter registration card issued to the voter;
(b) A driver’s license;
(c) An identification card issued by the Department of Motor
Vehicles;
(d) A military identification card; or
(e) Any other form of identification issued by a governmental
agency which contains the voter’s signature and physical description
or picture.
-
*AB228*

– 30 –
3.] The county clerk shall prescribe a procedure, approved by
the Secretary of State, to verify that the voter has not already voted
in that county in the current election.
Sec. 43. NRS 293.283 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.283 1. If, because of physical limitations, a registered
voter is unable to sign his or her name in the roster or on a signature
card as required by NRS 293.277, the voter must be identified by:
(a) Either:
(1) Answering questions from the election board officer
covering the personal data which is reported on the application to
register to vote; or
[(b)] (2) Providing the election board officer, orally or in
writing, with other personal data which verifies the identity of the
voter; [or] and
[(c) Providing]
(b) Presenting the election board officer with his or her proof
of [identification as described in NRS 293.277 other than the voter
registration card issued to the voter.] identity.
2. If the identity of the voter is verified, the election board
officer shall indicate in the roster “Identified” by the voter’s name.
Sec. 44. NRS 293.285 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.285 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.283
and 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive:
(a) A registered voter applying to vote shall state his or her
name to the election board officer in charge of the roster; and
(b) The election board officer shall:
(1) Announce the name of the registered voter;
(2) Require the registered voter to present proof of identity;
(3) Instruct the registered voter to sign the roster or signature
card;
[(3)] (4) Verify the signature of the registered voter in the
manner set forth in NRS 293.277; and
[(4)] (5) Verify that the registered voter has not already
voted in that county in the current election.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.57691, if the
signature does not match, the registered voter must be identified by:
(a) Answering questions from the election board officer
covering the personal data which is reported on the application to
register to vote;
(b) Providing the election board officer, orally or in writing,
with other personal data which verifies the identity of the registered
voter; or
(c) [Providing the election board officer with proof of
identification as described in NRS 293.277 other than the voter
registration card issued to the voter.] Comparing the signature of
-
*AB228*

– 31 –
the registered voter on the roster to the signature on the registered
voter’s proof of identity.
3. If the signature of the registered voter has changed in
comparison to the signature on the application to preregister or
register to vote, the registered voter must update his or her signature
on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State.
4. For the purposes of subsection 2, the personal data of a
registered voter may include his or her date of birth.
Sec. 45. NRS 293.287 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.287 1. A registered voter applying to vote at any primary
election or presidential preference primary election shall give his or
her name and political affiliation, if any, to the election board officer
in charge of the roster, and the officer shall immediately announce
the name and political affiliation [.] and require that the registered
voter present proof of identity.
2. Any person’s right to vote may be challenged by any
registered voter upon:
(a) Any of the grounds allowed for a challenge in NRS 293.303;
(b) The ground that the person applying does not belong to the
political party designated upon the roster; or
(c) The ground that the roster does not show that the person
designated the political party to which he or she claims to belong.
3. Any such challenge must be disposed of in the manner
provided by NRS 293.303.
4. A registered voter who has designated on his or her
application to register to vote an affiliation with a minor political
party may vote a nonpartisan ballot at the primary election.
Sec. 46. NRS 293.3025 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.3025 The Secretary of State and each county and city clerk
shall ensure that a copy of each of the following is posted in a
conspicuous place at each polling place on election day:
1. A sample ballot;
2. Information concerning the date and hours of operation of
the polling place;
3. Instructions for voting and casting a ballot, including a
provisional ballot pursuant to NRS 293.3078 to 293.3086, inclusive,
or a provisional ballot pursuant to NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887,
inclusive;
4. Instructions concerning the proof of identity required to
vote at the polling place;
5. Instructions concerning the identification required for
persons who registered by mail or computer and are first-time voters
for federal office in this State;
[5.] 6. Information concerning the accessibility of polling
places to persons with disabilities;
-
*AB228*

– 32 –
[6.] 7. General information concerning federal and state laws
which prohibit acts of fraud and misrepresentation; and
[7.] 8. Information concerning the eligibility of a candidate, a
ballot question or any other matter appearing on the ballot as a result
of a judicial determination or by operation of law, if any.
Sec. 47. NRS 293.303 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.303 1. A person applying to vote may be challenged:
(a) Orally by any registered voter of the precinct upon the
ground that he or she is not the person entitled to vote as claimed or
has voted before at the same election. A registered voter who
initiates a challenge pursuant to this paragraph must submit an
affirmation that is signed under penalty of perjury and in the form
prescribed by the Secretary of State stating that the challenge is
based on the personal knowledge of the registered voter.
(b) On any ground set forth in a challenge filed with the county
clerk pursuant to the provisions of NRS 293.547.
2. If a person is challenged, an election board officer shall
tender the challenged person the following oath or affirmation:
(a) If the challenge is on the ground that the challenged person
does not belong to the political party designated upon the roster, “I
swear or affirm under penalty of perjury that I belong to the political
party designated upon the roster”;
(b) If the challenge is on the ground that the roster does not
show that the challenged person designated the political party to
which he or she claims to belong, “I swear or affirm under penalty
of perjury that I designated on the application to register to vote the
political party to which I claim to belong”;
(c) If the challenge is on the ground that the challenged person
does not reside at the residence for which the address is listed in the
roster, “I swear or affirm under penalty of perjury that I reside at the
residence for which the address is listed in the roster”;
(d) If the challenge is on the ground that the challenged person
previously voted a ballot for the election, “I swear or affirm under
penalty of perjury that I have not voted for any of the candidates or
questions included on this ballot for this election”; or
(e) If the challenge is on the ground that the challenged person is
not the person he or she claims to be, “I swear or affirm under
penalty of perjury that I am the person whose name is in this roster.”
 The oath or affirmation must be set forth on a form prepared by
the Secretary of State and signed by the challenged person under
penalty of perjury.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, if the
challenged person refuses to execute the oath or affirmation so
tendered, the person must not be issued a ballot, and the election
-
*AB228*

– 33 –
board officer shall indicate in the roster “Challenged” by the
person’s name.
4. If the challenged person refuses to execute the oath or
affirmation set forth in paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection 2, the
election board officers shall issue the person a nonpartisan ballot.
5. If the challenged person refuses to execute the oath or
affirmation set forth in paragraph (c) of subsection 2, the election
board officers shall inform the person that he or she is entitled to
vote only in the manner prescribed in NRS 293.304.
6. If the challenged person executes the oath or affirmation and
the challenge is not based on the ground set forth in paragraph (e) of
subsection 2, the election board officers shall issue the person a
partisan ballot.
7. If the challenge is based on the ground set forth in paragraph
(c) of subsection 2, and the challenged person executes the oath or
affirmation, the election board shall not issue the person a ballot
until he or she furnishes satisfactory identification which contains
proof of the address at which the person actually resides. For the
purposes of this subsection, a voter registration card does not
provide proof of the address at which a person resides.
8. If the challenge is based on the ground set forth in paragraph
(e) of subsection 2 and the challenged person executes the oath or
affirmation, the election board shall not issue the person a ballot
unless the person [:
(a) Furnishes official identification which contains a photograph
of the person, such as a driver’s license or other official document;
or
(b) Brings before the election board officers a person who is at
least 18 years of age who:
(1) Furnishes official identification which contains a
photograph of that person, such as a driver’s license or other official
document; and
(2) Executes an oath or affirmation under penalty of perjury
that the challenged person is who he or she swears to be.] furnishes
proof of identity.
9. The election board officers shall:
(a) Record on the challenge list:
(1) The name of the challenged person;
(2) The name of the registered voter who initiated the
challenge; and
(3) The result of the challenge; and
(b) If possible, orally notify the registered voter who initiated
the challenge of the result of the challenge.
-
*AB228*

– 34 –
Sec. 48. NRS 293.3075 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.3075 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.283
and 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive, upon the appearance of a
person to cast a ballot at a polling place established pursuant to NRS
293.3072, the election board officer shall:
(a) Determine [that] whether the person is a registered voter in
the county and has not already voted in that county in the current
election;
(b) Require the registered voter to present proof of identity;
(c) Instruct the registered voter to sign the roster or a signature
card; and
[(c)] (d) Verify the signature of the registered voter in the
manner set forth in NRS 293.277.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.57691, if the
signature of the registered voter does not match, the registered voter
must be identified by:
(a) Either:
(1) Answering questions from the election board officer
covering the personal data which is reported on the application to
register to vote; or
[(b)] (2) Providing the election board officer, orally or in
writing, with other personal data which verifies the identity of the
registered voter; [or
(c) Providing] and
(b) Presenting the election board officer with his or her proof
of [identification as described in NRS 293.277 other than the voter
registration card issued to the voter.] identity.
3. If the signature of the registered voter has changed in
comparison to the signature on the application to register to vote, the
registered voter must update his or her signature on a form
prescribed by the Secretary of State.
4. The county clerk shall prescribe a procedure, approved by
the Secretary of State, to verify that the registered voter has not
already voted in that county in the current election.
5. When a registered voter is entitled to cast a ballot and has
identified himself or herself to the satisfaction of the election board
officer, the registered voter is entitled to receive the appropriate
ballot or ballots, but only for his or her own use at the polling place
where he or she applies to vote.
6. If the ballot is voted on a mechanical recording device which
directly records the votes electronically, the election board officer
shall:
(a) Prepare the mechanical voting device for the registered
voter;
-
*AB228*

– 35 –
(b) Ensure that the registered voter’s precinct or voting district
and the form of the ballot are indicated on the voting receipt, if the
county clerk uses voting receipts; and
(c) Allow the registered voter to cast a vote.
7. A registered voter applying to vote at a polling place
established pursuant to NRS 293.3072 may be challenged pursuant
to NRS 293.303.
Sec. 49. NRS 293.3081 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.3081 A person at a polling place may cast a provisional
ballot in an election pursuant to NRS 293.3078 to 293.3086,
inclusive, if the person complies with the applicable provisions of
NRS 293.3082 and:
1. Declares that he or she has registered to vote and is eligible
to vote at that election in that jurisdiction, but [his or her] :
(a) The name of the person does not appear on a voter
registration list as a voter eligible to vote in that election in that
jurisdiction [or an] ;
(b) An election official asserts that the person is not eligible to
vote in that election in that jurisdiction; or
(c) The person fails to present proof of identity;
2. Applies by mail or computer, on or after January 1, 2003, to
register to vote and has not previously voted in an election for
federal office in this State and fails to provide the identification
required pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 293.2725
to the election board officer at the polling place; or
3. Declares that he or she is entitled to vote after the polling
place would normally close as a result of a court order or other order
extending the time established for the closing of polls pursuant to a
law of this State in effect 10 days before the date of the election.
Sec. 50. NRS 293.3082 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.3082 1. Before a person may cast a provisional ballot
pursuant to NRS 293.3081, the person must complete a written
affirmation on a form provided by an election board officer, as
prescribed by the Secretary of State, at the polling place which
includes:
(a) The name of the person casting the provisional ballot;
(b) The reason for casting the provisional ballot;
(c) A statement in which the person casting the provisional
ballot affirms under penalty of perjury that he or she is a registered
voter in the jurisdiction and is eligible to vote in the election;
(d) The date and type of election;
(e) The signature of the person casting the provisional ballot;
(f) The signature of the election board officer;
(g) A unique affirmation identification number assigned to the
person casting the provisional ballot;
-
*AB228*

– 36 –
(h) If the person is casting the provisional ballot pursuant to
subsection 1 of NRS 293.3081:
(1) An indication by the person as to whether or not he or she
provided the required identification at the time the person applied to
register to vote;
(2) The address of the person as listed on the application to
register to vote;
(3) Information concerning the place, manner and
approximate date on which the person applied to register to vote;
(4) Any other information that the person believes may be
useful in verifying that the person has registered to vote; and
(5) A statement informing the voter that if the voter does not
provide [identification] proof of identity at the time the voter casts
the provisional ballot, the required [identification] proof of identity
must be provided to the county or city clerk not later than 5 p.m. on
the Friday following election day and that failure to do so will result
in the provisional ballot not being counted;
(i) If the person is casting the provisional ballot pursuant to
subsection 2 of NRS 293.3081:
(1) The address of the person as listed on the application to
register to vote;
(2) The voter registration number, if any, issued to the
person; and
(3) A statement informing the voter that the required
[identification] proof of identity must be provided to the county or
city clerk not later than 5 p.m. on the Friday following election day
and that failure to do so will result in the provisional ballot not
being counted; and
(j) If the person is casting the provisional ballot pursuant to
subsection 3 of NRS 293.3081, the voter registration number, if any,
issued to the person.
2. After a person completes a written affirmation pursuant to
subsection 1:
(a) The election board officer shall provide the person with a
receipt that includes the unique affirmation identification number
described in subsection 1 and that explains how the person may use
the free access system established pursuant to NRS 293.3086 to
ascertain whether the person’s vote was counted, and, if the vote
was not counted, the reason why the vote was not counted;
(b) The voter’s name and applicable information must be
entered into the roster in a manner which indicates that the voter
cast a provisional ballot; and
(c) The election board officer shall issue a provisional ballot to
the person to vote.
-
*AB228*

– 37 –
Sec. 51. NRS 293.3085 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.3085 1. Following each election, a canvass of the
provisional ballots cast in the election must be conducted pursuant
to NRS 293.387 and, if appropriate, pursuant to NRS 293C.387.
2. The county and city clerk shall not:
(a) Include any provisional ballot in the unofficial results
reported on election night; or
(b) Open any envelope containing a provisional ballot before 8
a.m. on the Wednesday following election day.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, a provisional
ballot must be counted if:
(a) The county or city clerk determines that the person who cast
the provisional ballot was registered to vote in the election, eligible
to vote in the election and issued the appropriate ballot for the
address at which the person resides;
(b) A voter who failed to provide required identification at the
polling place or with his or her mailed ballot provides the required
identification to the county or city clerk not later than 5 p.m. on the
Friday following election day [;] , including, if applicable, his or
her proof of identity; or
(c) A court order has not been issued by 5 p.m. on the Friday
following election day directing that provisional ballots cast
pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 293.3081 not be counted, and the
provisional ballot was cast pursuant to subsection 3 of
NRS 293.3081.
4. A provisional ballot must not be counted if the county or
city clerk determines that the person who cast the provisional ballot
cast the wrong ballot for the address at which the person resides.
Sec. 52. NRS 293.356 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.356 If a request is made to vote early by a registered voter
in person, the election board shall , except as otherwise provided in
NRS 293.3585, issue a ballot for early voting to the voter. Such a
ballot must be voted on the premises of a polling place for early
voting established pursuant to NRS 293.3564, 293.3572, 293.3575
or 298.690.
Sec. 53. NRS 293.3585 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.3585 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.283
and 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive, upon the appearance of a
person to cast a ballot for early voting, an election board officer
shall:
(a) Determine [that] whether the person is a registered voter in
the county.
(b) Require the registered voter to present proof of identity.
(c) Instruct the registered voter to sign the roster for early voting
or a signature card.
-
*AB228*

– 38 –
[(c)] (d) Verify the signature of the registered voter in the
manner set forth in NRS 293.277.
[(d)] (e) Verify that the registered voter has not already voted in
that county in the current election.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.57691, if the
signature of the registered voter does not match, the registered voter
must be identified by:
(a) Either:
(1) Answering questions from the election board officer
covering the personal data which is reported on the application to
register to vote; or
[(b)] (2) Providing the election board officer, orally or in
writing, with other personal data which verifies the identity of the
registered voter; [or
(c) Providing] and
(b) Presenting the election board officer with proof of
[identification as described in NRS 293.277 other than the voter
registration card issued to the voter.] identity.
3. If the signature of the registered voter has changed in
comparison to the signature on the application to register to vote, the
registered voter must update his or her signature on a form
prescribed by the Secretary of State.
4. The county clerk shall prescribe a procedure, approved by
the Secretary of State, to verify that the registered voter has not
already voted in that county in the current election.
5. The roster for early voting or a signature card, as applicable,
must contain:
(a) The registered voter’s name, the address where he or she is
registered to vote, his or her voter identification number and a place
for the voter’s signature;
(b) The registered voter’s precinct or voting district number, if
that information is available; and
(c) The date of voting early in person.
6. When a registered voter is entitled to cast a ballot and has
identified himself or herself to the satisfaction of the election board
officer, the registered voter is entitled to receive the appropriate
ballot or ballots, but only for his or her own use at the polling place
for early voting.
7. If the ballot is voted on a mechanical recording device which
directly records the votes electronically, the election board officer
shall:
(a) Prepare the mechanical recording device for the registered
voter;
-
*AB228*

– 39 –
(b) Ensure that the registered voter’s precinct or voting district,
if that information is available, and the form of ballot are indicated
on the voting receipt, if the county clerk uses voting receipts; and
(c) Allow the registered voter to cast a vote.
8. A registered voter applying to vote early by personal
appearance may be challenged pursuant to NRS 293.303.
9. For the purposes of subsection 2, the personal data of a
registered voter may include his or her date of birth.
Sec. 54. NRS 293.3625 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.3625 The county clerk shall make a record of the receipt at
the central counting place of each sealed container used to transport
official ballots pursuant to NRS 293.304, 293B.330 and 293B.335
[.] and section 19 of this act. The record must include the numbers
indicated on the container and its seal pursuant to NRS 293.462.
Sec. 55. NRS 293.365 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.365 [Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.269931,
no] No counting board in any precinct, district or polling place in
which paper ballots are used may commence to count the votes until
all ballots used or unused are accounted for.
Sec. 56. NRS 293.391 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.391 1. The voted ballots, rejected ballots, spoiled ballots,
challenge lists, records printed on paper of voted ballots collected
pursuant to NRS 293B.400 [, reports prepared pursuant to NRS
293.269937] and stubs of the ballots used, enclosed and sealed,
must, after canvass of the votes by the board of county
commissioners, be deposited in the vaults of the county clerk. The
records of voted ballots that are maintained in electronic form must,
after canvass of the votes by the board of county commissioners, be
sealed and deposited in the vaults of the county clerk. The tally lists
collected pursuant to this title must, after canvass of the votes by the
board of county commissioners, be deposited in the vaults of the
county clerk without being sealed. All materials described by this
subsection must be preserved for at least 22 months, and all such
sealed materials must be destroyed immediately after the
preservation period. A notice of the destruction must be published
by the clerk in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the
county not less than 2 weeks before the destruction.
2. Unused ballots, enclosed and sealed, must, after canvass of
the votes by the board of county commissioners, be deposited in the
vaults of the county clerk and preserved for at least the period
during which the election may be contested and adjudicated, after
which the unused ballots may be destroyed.
3. The rosters containing the signatures of those persons who
voted in the election and the tally lists deposited with the board of
county commissioners are subject to the inspection of any elector
-
*AB228*

– 40 –
who may wish to examine them at any time after their deposit with
the county clerk.
4. A contestant of an election may inspect all of the material
regarding that election which is preserved pursuant to subsection 1
or 2, except the voted ballots and records printed on paper of voted
ballots collected pursuant to NRS 293B.400 which are deposited
with the county clerk.
5. The voted ballots and records printed on paper of voted
ballots collected pursuant to NRS 293B.400 which are deposited
with the county clerk are not subject to the inspection of anyone,
except in cases of a contested election, and then only by the judge,
body or board before whom the election is being contested, or by the
parties to the contest, jointly, pursuant to an order of such judge,
body or board.
Sec. 57. NRS 293.462 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.462 1. Each container used to transport official ballots
pursuant to NRS 293.304, 293B.330 and 293B.335 and section 19
of this act must:
(a) Be constructed of metal or any other rigid material; and
(b) Contain a seal which is placed on the container to ensure
detection of any opening of the container.
2. The container and seal must be separately numbered for
identification.
Sec. 58. NRS 293.464 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.464 1. If a court of competent jurisdiction orders a
county to extend the deadline for voting beyond the statutory
deadline in a particular election, the county clerk shall, as soon as
practicable after receiving notice of the court’s decision:
(a) Cause notice of the extended deadline to be published in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county; and
(b) Transmit a notice of the extended deadline to each registered
voter who [received a mail] requested an absent ballot for the
election and has not returned the [mail] absent ballot before the date
on which the notice will be transmitted.
2. The notice required pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1
must be published:
(a) In a county whose population is 52,000 or more, on at least 3
successive days.
(b) In a county whose population is less than 52,000, at least
twice in successive issues of the newspaper.
Sec. 59. NRS 293.4688 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.4688 1. The Secretary of State shall ensure that:
(a) All public information that is included on the Internet
website required pursuant to NRS 293.4687 is accessible on a
mobile device; and
-
*AB228*

– 41 –
(b) A person may use a mobile device to submit any information
or form related to elections that a person may otherwise submit
electronically to the Secretary of State, including, without limitation,
an application to preregister or register to vote , a request for an
absent ballot and a request for a military-overseas ballot.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Military-overseas ballot” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 293D.050.
(b) “Mobile device” includes, without limitation, a smartphone
or a tablet computer.
Sec. 60. NRS 293.469 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.469 Each county clerk is encouraged to:
1. Not later than the earlier date of the notice provided pursuant
to NRS 293.203 or the first notice provided pursuant to subsection 3
of NRS 293.560, notify the public, through means designed to reach
members of the public who are elderly or disabled, of the provisions
of NRS [293.269911,] 293.269951, 293.2955 and 293.296 [.] and
sections 12, 14 and 15 of this act.
2. Provide in alternative audio and visual formats information
concerning elections, information concerning how to preregister or
register to vote and information concerning the manner of voting for
use by a person who is elderly or disabled, including, without
limitation, providing such information through a
telecommunications device that is accessible to a person who is
deaf.
3. Not later than 5 working days after receiving the request of a
person who is elderly or disabled, provide to the person, in a format
that can be used by the person, any requested material that is:
(a) Related to elections; and
(b) Made available by the county clerk to the public in printed
form.
Sec. 61. NRS 293.5002 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5002 1. The Secretary of State shall establish procedures
to allow a person for whom a fictitious address has been issued
pursuant to NRS 217.462 to 217.471, inclusive, to:
(a) Preregister or register to vote; and
(b) Vote by [mail] absent ballot,
 without revealing the confidential address of the person.
2. In addition to establishing appropriate procedures or
developing forms pursuant to subsection 1, the Secretary of State
shall develop a form to allow a person for whom a fictitious address
has been issued to preregister or register to vote or to change the
address of the person’s current preregistration or registration, as
applicable. The form must include:
-
*AB228*

– 42 –
(a) A section that contains the confidential address of the
person; and
(b) A section that contains the fictitious address of the person.
3. Upon receiving a completed form from a person for whom a
fictitious address has been issued, the Secretary of State shall:
(a) On the portion of the form that contains the fictitious address
of the person, indicate the county and precinct in which the person
will vote and forward this portion of the form to the appropriate
county clerk; and
(b) File the portion of the form that contains the confidential
address.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any request
received by the Secretary of State pursuant to subsection 3 shall be
deemed a request for a permanent absent ballot.
5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law:
(a) The Secretary of State and each county clerk shall keep the
portion of the form developed pursuant to subsection 2 that he or
she retains separate from other applications for preregistration or
registration.
(b) The Secretary of State or a county or city clerk shall not
make the name, confidential address, fictitious address, telephone
number or electronic mail address of the person who has been issued
a fictitious address available for:
(1) Inspection or copying; or
(2) Inclusion in any list that is made available for public
inspection,
 unless directed to do so by lawful order of a court of competent
jurisdiction.
Sec. 62. NRS 293.502 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.502 1. An elector:
(a) Who complies with the requirements for registration set forth
in the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 52
U.S.C. §§ 20301 et seq.;
(b) Who, not more than 60 days before an election:
(1) Is discharged from the Armed Forces of the United States
or is the spouse or dependent of an elector who is discharged from
the Armed Forces; or
(2) Is separated from employment outside the territorial
limits of the United States or is the spouse or dependent of an
elector who is separated from employment outside the territorial
limits of the United States;
(c) Who presents evidence of the discharge from the Armed
Forces or separation from employment described in paragraph (b) to
the county clerk; and
-
*AB228*

– 43 –
(d) Who is not registered to vote at the close of registration for
that election,
 must be allowed to register to vote in the election.
2. Such an elector must:
(a) Register in person; and
(b) Vote in the office of the county clerk unless the elector is
otherwise entitled to vote [a mail] an absent ballot pursuant to
federal law.
3. The Secretary of State shall adopt regulations to carry out a
program of registration for such electors.
Sec. 63. NRS 293.505 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.505 1. All justices of the peace, except those located in
county seats, are ex officio field registrars to carry out the
provisions of this chapter.
2. The county clerk shall appoint at least one registered voter to
serve as a field registrar of voters who, except as otherwise provided
in NRS 293.5055, shall preregister and register voters within the
county for which the field registrar is appointed. Except as
otherwise provided in subsection 1, a candidate for any office may
not be appointed or serve as a field registrar. A field registrar serves
at the pleasure of the county clerk and shall perform such duties as
the county clerk may direct. The county clerk shall not knowingly
appoint any person as a field registrar who has been convicted of a
felony involving theft or fraud. The Secretary of State may bring an
action against a county clerk to collect a civil penalty of not more
than $5,000 for each person who is appointed as a field registrar in
violation of this subsection. Any civil penalty collected pursuant to
this subsection must be deposited with the State Treasurer for credit
to the State General Fund.
3. A field registrar shall demand of any person who applies for
preregistration or registration all information required by the
application to preregister or register to vote, as applicable, and shall
administer all oaths required by this chapter.
4. When a field registrar has in his or her possession five or
more completed applications to preregister or register to vote, the
field registrar shall forward them to the county clerk, but in no case
may the field registrar hold any number of them for more than 10
days.
5. Each field registrar shall forward to the county clerk all
completed applications in his or her possession immediately after
the last day to register to vote by mail pursuant to NRS 293.560 or
293C.527, as applicable. Within 5 days after the last day to register
to vote by mail pursuant to NRS 293.560 or 293C.527, as
applicable, a field registrar shall return all unused applications in his
or her possession to the county clerk. If all of the unused
-
*AB228*

– 44 –
applications are not returned to the county clerk, the field registrar
shall account for the unreturned applications.
6. Each field registrar shall submit to the county clerk a list of
the serial numbers of the completed applications to preregister or
register to vote and the names of the electors on those applications.
The serial numbers must be listed in numerical order.
7. Each field registrar shall post notices sent to him or her by
the county clerk for posting in accordance with the election laws of
this State.
8. A field registrar, employee of a voter registration agency or
person assisting a voter pursuant to NRS 293.5235 shall not:
(a) Delegate any of his or her duties to another person; or
(b) Refuse to preregister or register a person on account of that
person’s political party affiliation.
9. A person shall not hold himself or herself out to be or
attempt to exercise the duties of a field registrar unless the person
has been so appointed.
10. A county clerk, field registrar, employee of a voter
registration agency or person assisting another person pursuant to
NRS 293.5235 shall not:
(a) Solicit a vote for or against a particular question or
candidate;
(b) Speak to a person on the subject of marking his or her ballot
for or against a particular question or candidate; or
(c) Distribute any petition or other material concerning a
candidate or question which will be on the ballot for the ensuing
election,
 while preregistering or registering the person.
11. When the county clerk receives applications to preregister
or register to vote from a field registrar, the county clerk shall issue
a receipt to the field registrar. The receipt must include:
(a) The number of persons preregistered or registered; and
(b) The political party of the persons preregistered or registered.
12. A county clerk, field registrar, employee of a voter
registration agency or person assisting another person pursuant to
NRS 293.5235 shall not:
(a) Knowingly:
(1) Register a person who is not a qualified elector or a
person who has filed a false or misleading application to register to
vote; or
(2) Preregister a person who does not meet the qualifications
set forth in NRS 293.4855; or
(b) Preregister or register a person who fails to provide
satisfactory [proof] evidence of [identification] his or her identity
and the address at which the person actually resides.
-
*AB228*

– 45 –
13. A county clerk, field registrar, employee of a voter
registration agency, person assisting another person pursuant to
NRS 293.5235 or any other person providing a form for the
application to preregister or register to vote to an elector for the
purpose of preregistering or registering to vote:
(a) If the person who assists another person with completing the
form for the application to preregister or register to vote retains the
form, shall enter his or her name on the duplicate copy or receipt
retained by the person upon completion of the form; and
(b) Shall not alter, deface or destroy an application to preregister
or register to vote that has been signed by a person except to correct
information contained in the application after receiving notice from
the person that a change in or addition to the information is required.
14. If a field registrar violates any of the provisions of this
section, the county clerk shall immediately suspend the field
registrar and notify the district attorney of the county in which the
violation occurred.
15. A person who violates any of the provisions of subsection
8, 9, 10, 12 or 13 is guilty of a category E felony and shall be
punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
Sec. 64. NRS 293.517 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.517 1. Any person who meets the qualifications set forth
in NRS 293.4855 residing within the county may preregister to vote
and any elector residing within the county may register to vote:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.560 and
293C.527, by appearing before the county clerk, a field registrar or a
voter registration agency, completing the application to preregister
or register to vote, giving true and satisfactory answers to all
questions relevant to his or her identity and right to preregister or
register to vote, and providing [proof] evidence of residence and
identity [;] in accordance with this subsection;
(b) By completing and mailing or personally delivering to the
county clerk an application to preregister or register to vote pursuant
to the provisions of NRS 293.5235;
(c) Pursuant to the provisions of NRS 293.5727 or chapter 293D
of NRS;
(d) At his or her residence with the assistance of a field registrar
pursuant to NRS 293.5237;
(e) By submitting an application to preregister or register to vote
by computer using the system established by the Secretary of State
pursuant to NRS 293.671; or
(f) By any other method authorized by the provisions of this
title.
 The county clerk shall require a person to submit official
identification as [proof] evidence of residence and identity [,] in
-
*AB228*

– 46 –
accordance with this subsection, such as a driver’s license or other
official document, before preregistering or registering the person. If
the applicant preregisters or registers to vote pursuant to this
subsection and fails to provide [proof] evidence of residence and
identity, the applicant must provide [proof] evidence of residence
and identity before casting a ballot in person or by mail or after
casting a provisional ballot pursuant to NRS 293.3078 to 293.3086,
inclusive. For the purposes of this subsection, a voter registration
card does not provide [proof] evidence of the residence or identity
of a person.
2. In addition to the methods for registering to vote described
in subsection 1, an elector may register to vote pursuant to:
(a) NRS 293.269951, if applicable;
(b) NRS 293.5768 to 293.57699, inclusive; or
(c) NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.5768 to
293.57699, inclusive, the application to preregister or register to
vote must be signed and verified under penalty of perjury by the
person preregistering or the elector registering.
4. Each person or elector who is or has been married must be
preregistered or registered under his or her own given or first name,
and not under the given or first name or initials of his or her spouse.
5. A person or an elector who is preregistered or registered and
changes his or her name must complete a new application to
preregister or register to vote, as applicable. The person or elector
may obtain a new application:
(a) At the office of the county clerk or field registrar;
(b) By submitting an application to preregister or register to vote
pursuant to the provisions of NRS 293.5235;
(c) By submitting a written statement to the county clerk
requesting the county clerk to mail an application to preregister or
register to vote;
(d) At any voter registration agency; or
(e) By submitting an application to preregister or register to vote
by computer using the system established by the Secretary of State
pursuant to NRS 293.671.
 If the elector fails to register under his or her new name, the
elector may be challenged pursuant to the provisions of NRS
293.303 or 293C.292 and may be required to furnish [proof]
evidence of his or her identity and subsequent change of name.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8 and NRS
293.5768 to 293.57699, inclusive, and 293.5772 to 293.5887,
inclusive, an elector who registers to vote pursuant to paragraph (a)
of subsection 1 shall be deemed to be registered upon the
completion of an application to register to vote.
-
*AB228*

– 47 –
7. After the county clerk determines that the application to
register to vote of a person is complete and that, except as otherwise
provided in NRS 293D.210, the person is eligible to vote pursuant
to NRS 293.485, the county clerk shall issue a voter registration
card to the voter.
8. If a person or an elector submits an application to preregister
or register to vote or an affidavit described in paragraph (c) of
subsection 1 of NRS 293.507 that contains any handwritten
additions, erasures or interlineations, the county clerk may object to
the application if the county clerk believes that because of such
handwritten additions, erasures or interlineations, the application is
incomplete or that, except as otherwise provided in NRS 293D.210,
the person is not eligible to preregister pursuant to NRS 293.4855 or
the elector is not eligible to vote pursuant to NRS 293.485, as
applicable. If the county clerk objects pursuant to this subsection, he
or she shall immediately notify the person or elector, as applicable,
and the district attorney of the county. Not later than 5 business days
after the district attorney receives such notification, the district
attorney shall advise the county clerk as to whether:
(a) The application is complete and, except as otherwise
provided in NRS 293D.210, the person is eligible to preregister
pursuant to NRS 293.4855 or the elector is eligible to vote pursuant
to NRS 293.485; and
(b) The county clerk should proceed to process the application.
9. If the district attorney advises the county clerk to process the
application pursuant to subsection 8, the county clerk shall
immediately issue a voter registration card to the applicant, unless
the applicant is preregistered to vote and does not currently meet the
requirements to be issued a voter registration card pursuant to
NRS 293.4855.
Sec. 65. NRS 293.541 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.541 1. The county clerk shall cancel the preregistration
of a person or the registration of a voter if:
(a) After consultation with the district attorney, the district
attorney determines that there is probable cause to believe that
information in the application to preregister or register to vote
concerning the identity or residence of the person or voter is
fraudulent;
(b) The county clerk provides a notice as required pursuant to
subsection 2 or executes an affidavit of cancellation pursuant to
subsection 3; and
(c) The person or voter fails to present satisfactory [proof]
evidence of identity and residence pursuant to subsection 2, 4 or 5.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the county
clerk shall notify the person or voter by registered or certified mail,
-
*AB228*

– 48 –
return receipt requested, of a determination made pursuant to
subsection 1. The notice must set forth the grounds for cancellation.
Unless the person or voter, within 15 days after the return receipt
has been filed in the office of the county clerk, presents satisfactory
[proof] evidence of identity and residence to the county clerk, the
county clerk shall cancel the person’s preregistration or the voter’s
registration, as applicable.
3. If insufficient time exists before a pending election to
provide the notice required by subsection 2 to a registered voter, the
county clerk shall execute an affidavit of cancellation and attach a
copy of the affidavit of cancellation in the roster.
4. If a voter appears to vote at the election next following the
date that an affidavit of cancellation was executed for the voter
pursuant to this section, the voter must be allowed to vote only if the
voter furnishes:
(a) [Official identification which contains a photograph] Proof
of [the voter, including, without limitation, a driver’s license or
other official document;] identity; and
(b) Satisfactory [identification that contains proof] evidence of
the address at which the voter actually resides and that address is
consistent with the address listed on the roster.
5. If a determination is made pursuant to subsection 1
concerning information in the registration to vote of a voter and [a
mail] an absent ballot is received from the voter, the [mail] absent
ballot must be kept separate from other ballots and must not be
counted unless the voter presents satisfactory proof of identity to the
county clerk [of identity] and satisfactory proof of residence before
such ballots are counted on election day.
6. For the purposes of this section, a voter registration card
does not provide [proof] evidence of the:
(a) Address at which a person actually resides; or
(b) Residence [or identity] of a person.
Sec. 66. NRS 293.5768 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5768 1. The following agencies are automatic voter
registration agencies:
(a) The Department of Motor Vehicles;
(b) The Department of Health and Human Services;
(c) Any agency designated by the Director of the Department of
Health and Human Services to receive applications for Medicaid;
(d) The Silver State Health Insurance Exchange created by
NRS 695I.200;
(e) Any agency that has been designated by the Governor as an
automatic voter registration agency pursuant to NRS 293.57682; and
-
*AB228*

– 49 –
(f) Any agency of an Indian tribe that has been designated by the
Governor to be an automatic voter registration agency pursuant to
NRS 293.57684.
2. If, in the normal course of business, an automatic voter
registration agency collects sufficient information that demonstrates
a person is qualified to vote pursuant to NRS 293.485, including,
without limitation, [proof] evidence of identity, citizenship,
residence and date of birth, the provisions of NRS 293.5768 to
293.57699, inclusive, apply to the automatic voter registration
agency when a person submits any of the following:
(a) An application for the issuance or renewal of or change of
address for any type of driver’s license or identification card issued
by the Department of Motor Vehicles;
(b) An application for Medicaid through the system established
by the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to
NRS 422.2703;
(c) An application for health insurance through the Silver State
Health Insurance Exchange; and
(d) An application for any service or assistance from an
automatic voter registration agency described in paragraph (e) or (f)
of subsection 1.
3. An automatic voter registration agency shall not:
(a) Request any additional information for purposes of voter
registration that is not required in the normal course of business; and
(b) Transmit any information about a person using the system
established pursuant to NRS 293.57686 if the person did not provide
the agency in the normal course of business sufficient information
that demonstrates the person is qualified to vote pursuant to NRS
293.485, including, without limitation, [proof] evidence of identity,
citizenship, residence and date of birth.
Sec. 67. NRS 293.57682 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.57682 1. The Governor may designate any agency in the
Executive Department of the State Government not described in
paragraphs (a) to (d), inclusive, of subsection 1 of NRS 293.5768 as
an automatic voter registration agency if the agency collects in the
regular course of business from a person applying to the agency to
receive any service or assistance sufficient information that
demonstrates a person is qualified to vote pursuant to NRS 293.485,
including, without limitation, [proof] evidence of identity,
citizenship, residence and date of birth.
2. Upon the designation of an agency as an automatic voter
registration agency pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) The Governor shall notify the Secretary of State; and
-
*AB228*

– 50 –
(b) The Secretary of State and the automatic voter registration
agency shall comply with the provisions of NRS 293.57686.
Sec. 68. NRS 293.57684 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.57684 1. If an Indian reservation or Indian colony is
located in whole or in part within a county, the Indian tribe may
submit a request to the Governor for approval to allow an agency of
the tribe to become an automatic voter registration agency in order
to submit voter registration information of tribal members to the
Secretary of State and the database created by the Secretary of State
pursuant to NRS 293.675 for the purpose of registering tribal
members to vote or updating the voter registration information of
tribal members for the purpose of correcting the statewide voter
registration list pursuant to NRS 293.530.
2. If the Governor finds that the tribal agency collects in the
regular course of business from a person applying to the agency to
receive any service or assistance sufficient information that
demonstrates the person is qualified to vote pursuant to NRS
293.485, including, without limitation, [proof] evidence of identity,
citizenship, residence and date of birth:
(a) The Governor shall designate the tribal agency as an
automatic voter registration agency; and
(b) The Secretary of State and the Indian tribe shall comply with
the provisions of NRS 293.57686.
Sec. 69. NRS 293.57691 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.57691 1. A county clerk shall not reject as an application
to register to vote the information received from an automatic voter
registration agency solely on the basis that the information does not
contain an electronic facsimile of the signature of the person who is
applying to vote or update his or her voter registration information
on the statewide voter registration list.
2. If the county clerk does not receive an electronic facsimile
of the signature of the person from the automatic voter registration
agency, the county clerk must obtain the person’s signature or an
electronic facsimile of the person’s signature through one of the
following methods:
(a) Through the notice provided by the county clerk to the
person pursuant to NRS 293.57693, if the notice is returned to
the county clerk by the person and the returned notice includes the
person’s signature;
(b) Requesting an electronic facsimile of the person’s signature
from the Department of Motor Vehicles or another state agency;
-
*AB228*

– 51 –
(c) Requesting the person to submit an electronic facsimile of
the person’s signature through a method approved by the Secretary
of State; or
(d) Requesting the person to sign a paper or electronic form the
first time the person applies to vote in person at a polling place,
including, without limitation, a polling place for early voting by
personal appearance. A signature provided by a person pursuant to
this paragraph must be compared to one of the forms of
[identification] the person’s proof of identity which [may be used
individually to identify a voter at the polling place set forth in NRS
293.277] includes his or her signature before the person is allowed
to vote in person.
3. In addition to the requirements of this section and NRS
293.2725, a person who is registered to vote pursuant to NRS
293.5768 to 293.57699, inclusive, must provide an affirmation
signed under penalty of perjury that the person is eligible to vote the
first time a person votes in person or by [mail] absent ballot if the
person has not already provided such an affirmation to the county
clerk.
Sec. 70. NRS 293.5837 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5837 1. An elector may register to vote in the county or
city, as applicable, in which the elector is eligible to vote by
submitting an application to register to vote by computer using the
system established by the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS
293.671 before the elector appears at a polling place described in
subsection 2 to vote in person.
2. If an elector submits an application to register to vote
pursuant to this section less than 14 days before the election, the
elector may vote only in person:
(a) During the period for early voting, at any polling place for
early voting by personal appearance in the county or city, as
applicable, in which the elector is eligible to vote; or
(b) On the day of the election, at:
(1) A polling place established pursuant to NRS 293.3072 or
293C.3032 in the county or city, as applicable, in which the elector
is eligible to vote; or
(2) The polling place for his or her election precinct.
3. To vote in person, an elector who submits an application to
register to vote pursuant to this section must:
(a) Appear before the close of polls at a polling place described
in subsection 2;
(b) Inform an election board officer that, before appearing at the
polling place, the elector submitted an application to register to vote
by computer using the system established by the Secretary of State
pursuant to NRS 293.671; and
-
*AB228*

– 52 –
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, provide his or
her current and valid driver’s license or identification card issued by
the Department of Motor Vehicles which shows his or her physical
address as [proof] evidence of the elector’s identity and residency.
4. If the driver’s license or identification card issued by the
Department of Motor Vehicles to the elector does not have the
elector’s current residential address, the following documents may
be used to establish the residency of the elector if the current
residential address of the elector, as indicated on his or her
application to register to vote, is displayed on the document:
(a) A military identification card;
(b) A utility bill, including, without limitation, a bill for electric,
gas, oil, water, sewer, septic, telephone, cellular telephone or cable
television service;
(c) A bank or credit union statement;
(d) A paycheck;
(e) An income tax return;
(f) A statement concerning the mortgage, rental or lease of a
residence;
(g) A motor vehicle registration;
(h) A property tax statement; or
(i) Any other document issued by a governmental agency.
5. Subject to final verification, if an elector submits an
application to register to vote and appears at a polling place to vote
in person pursuant to this section:
(a) The elector shall be deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place upon:
(1) The determination that the elector submitted the
application to register to vote by computer using the system
established by the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS 293.671 and
that the application to register to vote is complete; and
(2) The verification of the elector’s identity and residency
pursuant to this section.
(b) After the elector is deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place pursuant to paragraph (a), the elector:
(1) May vote in the election only at that polling place;
(2) Must vote as soon as practicable and before leaving that
polling place; and
(3) Must vote by casting a provisional ballot, unless it is
verified, at that time, that the elector is qualified to register to vote
and to cast a regular ballot in the election at that polling place.
Sec. 71. NRS 293.5842 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5842 1. Notwithstanding the close of any method of
registration for an election pursuant to NRS 293.560 or 293C.527,
an elector may register to vote in person at any polling place for
-
*AB228*

– 53 –
early voting by personal appearance in the county or city, as
applicable, in which the elector is eligible to vote.
2. To register to vote in person during the period for early
voting, an elector must:
(a) Appear before the close of polls at a polling place for early
voting by personal appearance in the county or city, as applicable, in
which the elector is eligible to vote.
(b) Complete the application to register to vote by a method
authorized by the county or city clerk pursuant to this paragraph.
The county or city clerk shall authorize at least one of the following
methods for a person to register to vote pursuant to this paragraph:
(1) A paper application; or
(2) The system established by the Secretary of State pursuant
to NRS 293.671.
 If the county or city clerk authorizes the use of both methods, the
county or city clerk may limit the use of one method to
circumstances when the other method is not reasonably available.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, provide his or
her current and valid driver’s license or identification card issued by
the Department of Motor Vehicles which shows his or her physical
address as [proof] evidence of the elector’s identity and residency.
3. If the driver’s license or identification card issued by the
Department of Motor Vehicles to the elector does not have the
elector’s current residential address, the following documents may
be used to establish the residency of the elector if the current
residential address of the elector, as indicated on his or her
application to register to vote, is displayed on the document:
(a) A military identification card;
(b) A utility bill, including, without limitation, a bill for electric,
gas, oil, water, sewer, septic, telephone, cellular telephone or cable
television service;
(c) A bank or credit union statement;
(d) A paycheck;
(e) An income tax return;
(f) A statement concerning the mortgage, rental or lease of a
residence;
(g) A motor vehicle registration;
(h) A property tax statement; or
(i) Any other document issued by a governmental agency.
4. Subject to final verification, if an elector registers to vote in
person at a polling place pursuant to this section:
(a) The elector shall be deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place upon:
(1) The determination that the application to register to vote
is complete; and
-
*AB228*

– 54 –
(2) The verification of the elector’s identity and residency
pursuant to this section.
(b) After the elector is deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place pursuant to paragraph (a), the elector:
(1) May vote in the election only at that polling place;
(2) Must vote as soon as practicable and before leaving that
polling place; and
(3) Must vote by casting a provisional ballot, unless it is
verified, at that time, that the elector is qualified to register to vote
and to cast a regular ballot in the election at that polling place.
Sec. 72. NRS 293.5847 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5847 1. Notwithstanding the close of any method of
registration for an election pursuant to NRS 293.560 or 293C.527,
an elector may register to vote in person on the day of the election at
any polling place in the county or city, as applicable, in which the
elector is eligible to vote.
2. To register to vote on the day of the election, an elector
must:
(a) Appear before the close of polls at a polling place in the
county or city, as applicable, in which the elector is eligible to vote.
(b) Complete the application to register to vote by a method
authorized by the county or city clerk pursuant to this paragraph.
The county or city clerk shall authorize at least one of the following
methods for a person to register to vote pursuant to this paragraph:
(1) A paper application; or
(2) The system established by the Secretary of State pursuant
to NRS 293.671.
 If the county or city clerk authorizes the use of both methods, the
county or city clerk may limit the use of one method to
circumstances when the other method is not reasonably available.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, provide his or
her current and valid driver’s license or identification card issued by
the Department of Motor Vehicles which shows his or her physical
address as [proof] evidence of the elector’s identity and residency.
3. If the driver’s license or identification card issued by the
Department of Motor Vehicles to the elector does not have the
elector’s current residential address, the following documents may
be used to establish the residency of the elector if the current
residential address of the elector, as indicated on his or her
application to register to vote, is displayed on the document:
(a) A military identification card;
(b) A utility bill, including, without limitation, a bill for electric,
gas, oil, water, sewer, septic, telephone, cellular telephone or cable
television service;
(c) A bank or credit union statement;
-
*AB228*

– 55 –
(d) A paycheck;
(e) An income tax return;
(f) A statement concerning the mortgage, rental or lease of a
residence;
(g) A motor vehicle registration;
(h) A property tax statement; or
(i) Any other document issued by a governmental agency.
4. Subject to final verification, if an elector registers to vote in
person at a polling place pursuant to this section:
(a) The elector shall be deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place upon:
(1) The determination that the application to register to vote
is complete; and
(2) The verification of the elector’s identity and residency
pursuant to this section.
(b) After the elector is deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place pursuant to paragraph (a), the elector:
(1) May vote in the election only at that polling place;
(2) Must vote as soon as practicable and before leaving that
polling place; and
(3) Must vote by casting a provisional ballot.
Sec. 73. NRS 293.730 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.730 1. Except for an election board officer in the course
of the election board officer’s official duties, a person shall not:
(a) Remain in or outside of any polling place so as to interfere
with the conduct of the election.
(b) Accept from any voter a ballot prepared by or on behalf of
the voter, other than [a mail] an absent ballot or military-overseas
ballot prepared by or on behalf of the voter with his or her
authorization pursuant to this title.
(c) Remove a ballot from any polling place before the closing of
the polls.
(d) Apply for or receive a ballot at any election precinct or
district other than one at which the person is entitled to vote.
(e) Show his or her ballot to another person, after voting, so as
to reveal any of his or her votes on the ballot, other than on his or
her [mail] absent ballot or military-overseas ballot prepared by or
on behalf of the voter with his or her authorization pursuant to this
title.
(f) Inside a polling place, ask another person for his or her name,
address or political affiliation or for whom he or she intends to vote.
(g) Send, transmit, distribute or deliver a ballot to a voter, other
than [a mail] an absent ballot or military-overseas ballot when
permitted pursuant to this title.
-
*AB228*

– 56 –
(h) Except when permitted by the voter, alter, change, deface,
damage or destroy [a mail] an absent ballot or military-overseas
ballot prepared by or on behalf of the voter with his or her
authorization pursuant to this title.
2. A voter shall not:
(a) Accept a ballot from another person, other than an election
board officer in the course of the election board officer’s official
duties or a person who sends, transmits, distributes or delivers [a
mail] an absent ballot or military-overseas ballot to the voter when
permitted pursuant to this title.
(b) Deliver to an election board officer in the course of the
election board officer’s official duties any ballot other than the one
received.
(c) Place any mark upon his or her ballot by which it may
afterward be identified as the one that he or she voted, other than
any such mark that is permitted to be placed on [a mail] an absent
ballot or military-overseas ballot prepared by or on behalf of the
voter with his or her authorization pursuant to this title.
3. [A person other than a county or city clerk shall not set up a
ballot drop box that purports to be an official ballot drop box for
mail ballots.
4.] Any person who violates any provision of this section is
guilty of a category E felony and shall be punished as provided in
NRS 193.130.
Sec. 74. NRS 293.775 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.775 1. A person who is not a qualified elector and who
votes or attempts to vote knowing that he or she is not a qualified
elector is guilty of a category D felony and shall be punished as
provided in NRS 193.130.
2. A person who votes or attempts to vote using the name of
another person , including, without limitation, voting the absent
ballot of another person, is guilty of a category D felony and shall
be punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
Sec. 75. Chapter 293B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The absent ballot central counting board shall:
1. Perform functions similar to those of the central ballot
inspection board and the ballot duplicating board as those
functions are applicable to absent ballots.
2. Bundle the empty absent ballot return envelopes according
to ballot type or precinct and deliver the bundles to the county
clerk.
3. Treat any absent ballot return envelope found not to
contain a ballot as a rejected ballot and place each such envelope
-
*AB228*

– 57 –
in a separate larger envelope on which must be written the ballot
code or precinct and the reason for the rejection.
Sec. 76. NRS 293B.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293B.130 1. Before any election where a mechanical voting
system is to be used, the county clerk shall prepare or cause to be
prepared a computer program on cards, tape or other material
suitable for use with the computer or counting device to be
employed for counting the votes cast. The program must cause the
computer or counting device to operate in the following manner:
(a) All lawful votes cast by each voter must be counted.
(b) All unlawful votes, including, without limitation, overvotes
or, in a primary election or presidential preference primary election,
votes cast for a candidate of a major political party other than the
party, if any, of the registration of the voter must not be counted.
(c) If the election is:
(1) A primary election held in an even-numbered year;
(2) A presidential preference primary election; or
(3) A general election,
 the total votes, other than [mail] absent ballots, must be
accumulated by precinct.
(d) The computer or counting device must halt or indicate by
appropriate signal if a ballot is encountered which lacks a code
identifying the precinct in which it was voted and, in a primary
election or presidential preference primary election, identifying the
major political party of the voter.
2. The program must be prepared under the supervision of the
accuracy certification board appointed pursuant to the provisions of
NRS 293B.140.
3. The county clerk shall take such measures as he or she
deems necessary to protect the program from being altered or
damaged.
Sec. 77. NRS 293B.360 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293B.360 1. To facilitate the processing and computation of
votes cast at any election conducted under a mechanical voting
system, the county clerk shall create a computer program and
processing accuracy board, and may create:
(a) A central ballot inspection board;
(b) [A mail] An absent ballot [inspection] central counting
board;
(c) A ballot duplicating board;
(d) A ballot processing and packaging board; and
(e) Such additional boards or appoint such officers as the county
clerk deems necessary for the expeditious processing of ballots.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the county
clerk may determine the number of members to constitute any
-
*AB228*

– 58 –
board. The county clerk shall make any appointments from among
competent persons who are registered voters in this State. The
members of each board must represent all political parties as equally
as possible. The same person may be appointed to more than one
board but must meet the particular qualifications for each board to
which he or she is appointed.
3. If the county clerk creates a ballot duplicating board, the
county clerk shall appoint to the board at least two members. The
members of the ballot duplicating board must not all be of the same
political party.
4. All persons appointed pursuant to this section serve at the
pleasure of the county clerk.
Sec. 78. NRS 293B.380 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293B.380 1. The ballot processing and packaging board must
be composed of persons who are qualified in the use of the data
processing equipment to be operated for the voting count.
2. The board shall:
(a) Allow members of the general public to observe the counting
area where the computers are located during the period when ballots
are being processed if those members do not interfere with the
processing of the ballots.
(b) Receive ballots and maintain groupings of them by precinct.
(c) Before each counting of the ballots or computer run begins,
validate the testing material with the counting program.
(d) Maintain a log showing the sequence in which the ballots of
each precinct are processed, as a measure to ensure that the ballots
of all precincts are processed.
(e) After each counting of the ballots, again verify the testing
material with the counting program to substantiate that there has
been no substitution or irregularity.
(f) Record an explanation of any irregularity that occurs in the
processing.
(g) If the election is:
(1) A primary election held in an even-numbered year; or
(2) A general election,
 ensure that a list is compiled indicating the total votes, other than
[mail] absent ballots, which each candidate accumulated in each
precinct.
(h) Collect all returns, programs, testing materials, ballots and
other items used in the election at the computer center and package
and deliver the items to the county clerk for sealing and storage.
-
*AB228*

– 59 –
Sec. 79. Chapter 293C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 80 to 104, inclusive, of
this act.
Sec. 80. 1. When it appears to the satisfaction of the city
clerk that an absent ballot central counting board will expedite the
work of tallying the absent ballot vote of the city, the city clerk may
appoint such a board.
2. In a city where an absent ballot central counting board has
been appointed, no central election board may be appointed. The
absent ballot central counting board shall perform the duties of
the central election board.
Sec. 81. 1. An absent ballot central counting board consists
of election board officers appointed in such numbers as the city
clerk determines to be required by the volume of absent ballots
requested.
2. The city clerk’s deputies who perform duties in connection
with elections shall be deemed officers of the absent ballot central
counting board.
3. When requested by the city clerk, the chief law
enforcement officer of the city shall appoint an officer to keep
order during the counting of the absent ballot votes by the absent
ballot central counting board.
4. The absent ballot central counting board is under the
direction of the city clerk.
Sec. 82. An absent ballot for a city election must be voted:
1. On a paper ballot; or
2. By any other system authorized by state or federal law.
Sec. 83. As used in sections 83 to 90, inclusive, of this act,
“sufficient written notice” means a:
1. Written request for an absent ballot that is signed by the
registered voter and returned to the city clerk in person or by mail
or approved electronic transmission;
2. Form prescribed by the Secretary of State that is completed
and signed by the registered voter and returned to the city clerk in
person or by mail or approved electronic transmission; or
3. Form provided by the Federal Government.
Sec. 84. 1. The city clerk shall prepare an absent ballot for
the use of registered voters who have requested absent ballots. The
city clerk shall make reasonable accommodations for the use of
the absent ballot by a person who is elderly or disabled, including,
without limitation, by providing, upon request, the absent ballot in
12-point type to a person who is elderly or disabled.
2. The ballot must be prepared and ready for distribution to a
registered voter who:
-
*AB228*

– 60 –
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), resides
within or outside this State, not later than 20 days before the city
election in which it will be used.
(b) Requested an absent ballot pursuant to the provisions of
the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 52
U.S.C. §§ 20301 et seq., not later than 45 days before the election.
3. Any untimely legal action which would prevent the ballot
from being distributed to any voter pursuant to subsection 2 is
moot and of no effect.
Sec. 85. 1. A person who, during the 6 months immediately
preceding an election, distributes to more than a total of 500
registered voters a form to request an absent ballot for the election
shall:
(a) Distribute the form prescribed by the Secretary of State,
which must, in 14-point type or larger at the top of the first page of
the form:
(1) Identify the person who is distributing the form; and
(2) Include the following notice stating, with the first
sentence of the notice in bold type:

This is not an official elections notice from the Secretary
of State or your county or city clerk. This is a form to
request an absent ballot that you may submit to your county
or city clerk if you want to vote by absent ballot. However,
even if you want to vote by absent ballot, you do not need to
submit this form if you have already requested an absent
ballot for this election year or are already entitled to receive
an absent ballot for all elections.

(b) Not later than 28 days before distributing such a form,
provide to the city clerk of each city to which a form will be
distributed written notification of the approximate number of
forms to be distributed to voters in the city and of the first date on
which the forms will be distributed.
(c) Not return or offer to return to a city clerk a form that was
mailed to a registered voter pursuant to this subsection.
(d) Not mail such a form later than 35 days before the election.
2. The provisions of this section do not authorize a person to
vote by absent ballot if the person is not otherwise eligible to vote
by absent ballot.
Sec. 86. 1. Except as otherwise provided in chapter 293D of
NRS and section 97 of this act, a registered voter who requests and
receives an absent ballot may vote only by absent ballot at the
election for which the absent ballot was issued.
-
*AB228*

– 61 –
2. If a registered voter has requested an absent ballot and the
absent ballot has been mailed or issued, the city clerk shall notify
the appropriate election board that the registered voter has
requested an absent ballot.
Sec. 87. 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.502
and 293C.265 and sections 89 and 90 of this act, a registered voter
may request an absent ballot if, before 5 p.m. on the 14th calendar
day preceding the election, the registered voter:
(a) Provides sufficient written notice to the city clerk; and
(b) Has identified himself or herself to the satisfaction of the
city clerk.
2. A city clerk shall consider a request from a registered voter
who has given sufficient written notice on a form provided by
the Federal Government as a request for an absent ballot for the
primary city and general city elections immediately following the
date on which the city clerk received the request.
3. It is unlawful for a person fraudulently to request an
absent ballot in the name of another person or to induce or coerce
another person fraudulently to request an absent ballot in the
name of another person. A person who violates any provision of
this subsection is guilty of a category E felony and shall be
punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
Sec. 88. 1. Every request for an absent ballot must be made
available for public inspection.
2. A city clerk who allows a person to copy information from
an application for an absent ballot is immune from any civil or
criminal liability for any damage caused by the distribution of that
information, unless the city clerk knowingly and willingly allows a
person who intends to use the information to further an unlawful
act to copy such information.
Sec. 89. 1. Any registered voter who is unable to go to the
polls:
(a) Because of an illness or disability resulting in confinement
in a hospital, sanatorium, dwelling or nursing home; or
(b) Because the registered voter is suddenly hospitalized,
becomes seriously ill or is called away from home after the time
has elapsed for requesting an absent ballot for the election
pursuant to subsection 1 of section 87 of this act,
 may submit a written request to the city clerk for an absent
ballot. The request must be submitted before 5 p.m. on the day of
the election.
2. If the city clerk determines that a request submitted
pursuant to subsection 1 includes the information required
pursuant to subsection 3, the city clerk shall, at the office of the
-
*AB228*

– 62 –
city clerk, deliver an absent ballot to the person designated in the
request to obtain the absent ballot for the registered voter.
3. A written request submitted pursuant to subsection 1 must
include:
(a) The name, address and signature of the registered voter
requesting the absent ballot;
(b) The name, address and signature of the person designated
by the registered voter to obtain, deliver and return the absent
ballot for the registered voter;
(c) A brief statement of the illness or disability of the registered
voter or of facts sufficient to establish that the registered voter was
called away from home after the time had elapsed for requesting
the absent ballot;
(d) If the registered voter is confined in a hospital, sanatorium,
dwelling or nursing home, a statement that he or she will be
confined therein on the day of the election; and
(e) Unless the person designated pursuant to paragraph (b)
will mark and sign the absent ballot on behalf of the registered
voter pursuant to subsection 5, a statement signed under penalty
of perjury that only the registered voter will mark and sign the
absent ballot.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, in order to
vote the absent ballot, the registered voter must, in accordance
with the instructions:
(a) Mark and fold the absent ballot;
(b) Deposit the absent ballot in the return envelope and seal
the return envelope;
(c) Affix his or her signature on the return envelope in the
space provided for the signature;
(d) Write in the space provided on the return envelope one of
the following:
(1) The last four digits of his or her driver’s license number
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles;
(2) If the voter does not have a driver’s license number
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles, the last four digits of
his or her social security number; or
(3) If the voter does not have a driver’s license number
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles or a social security
number, the identification number issued by the county clerk
pursuant to NRS 293.507;
(e) Close the attached flap over the signature and identifying
numbers written on the return envelope; and
(f) Mail or deliver the return envelope in a manner authorized
by law.
-
*AB228*

– 63 –
5. A person designated in a request submitted pursuant to
subsection 3 may, on behalf of and at the direction of the
registered voter, mark and sign the absent ballot. If the person
marks and signs the absent ballot pursuant to this section, the
person must:
(a) Indicate next to his or her signature that the absent ballot
has been marked and signed on behalf of the registered voter; and
(b) Submit a written statement with the absent ballot that
indicates the name, address and signature of the person.
6. An absent ballot prepared by or on behalf of the registered
voter pursuant to this section must be mailed or delivered to the
city clerk in accordance with section 91 of this act.
7. The procedure authorized by this section is subject to all
other provisions of this chapter relating to voting by absent ballot
to the extent that those provisions are not inconsistent with the
provisions of this section.
Sec. 90. 1. A registered voter who provides sufficient
written notice to the appropriate city clerk may request that the
registered voter receive an absent ballot for all elections at which
the registered voter is eligible to vote.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, upon receipt
of a request submitted by a registered voter pursuant to subsection
1, the city clerk shall:
(a) Issue an absent ballot to the registered voter for each
primary city election, general city election and special city election
that is conducted after the date the written statement is submitted
to the city clerk.
(b) Inform the applicable county clerk of the receipt of the
written statement. Upon receipt of the notice from the city clerk,
the county clerk shall issue an absent ballot for each primary
election, presidential preference primary election, general election
and special election that is not a city election that is conducted
after the date the county clerk receives notice from the city clerk.
3. If, at the direction of a registered voter with a physical
disability or who is at least 65 years of age, a person:
(a) Marks and signs an absent ballot issued to the registered
voter pursuant to the provisions of this section on behalf of the
registered voter, the person must:
(1) Indicate next to his or her signature that the ballot has
been marked and signed on behalf of the registered voter; and
(2) Submit a written statement with the absent ballot that
includes the name, address and signature of the person.
(b) Assists the registered voter to mark and sign an absent
ballot issued to the registered voter pursuant to this section, the
person or registered voter must submit a written statement with the
-
*AB228*

– 64 –
absent ballot that includes the name, address and signature of the
person.
4. A city clerk may not mail an absent ballot requested by a
registered voter pursuant to subsection 1 if, after the request is
submitted:
(a) The registered voter is designated inactive pursuant to
NRS 293.530;
(b) The county clerk cancels the registration of the person
pursuant to NRS 293.530, 293.535 or 293.540; or
(c) An absent ballot is returned to the county clerk as
undeliverable, unless the registered voter has submitted a new
request pursuant to subsection 1.
5. The procedure authorized pursuant to this section is
subject to all other provisions of this chapter relating to voting by
absent ballot to the extent that those provisions are not
inconsistent with the provisions of this section.
Sec. 91. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
absent ballots must be:
(a) Delivered by hand to the city clerk before the time set for
closing of the polls pursuant to NRS 293C.267; or
(b) Mailed to the city clerk, and:
(1) Postmarked at least 3 days before the day of the
election; and
(2) Received by the city clerk within the period for the
counting of the absent ballots pursuant to subsection 2 of section
98 of this act.
2. If an absent ballot is received not more than 3 days after
the day of the election and the date of the postmark cannot be
determined, the absent ballot shall be deemed to have been
postmarked at least 3 days before the day of the election.
Sec. 92. The city clerk shall determine before issuing an
absent ballot that the person who requested the absent ballot is a
registered voter in the proper city.
Sec. 93. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2
and chapter 293D of NRS, if the request for an absent ballot is
made properly, the city clerk shall, as soon as the official absent
ballot for the precinct or district in which the voter resides has
been printed, send to the voter by first-class mail, or by any class
of mail if the Official Election Mail logo or mark created by the
United States Postal Service is properly placed on the official
absent ballot:
(a) An absent ballot;
(b) A return envelope, which must include, without limitation,
a flap to cover the signature and identifying numbers of the voter
required to be written on the return envelope;
-
*AB228*

– 65 –
(c) An envelope or similar device into which the ballot is
inserted to ensure its secrecy; and
(d) An identification envelope, if applicable; and
(e) Instructions.
2. If the city clerk fails to send an absent ballot pursuant to
subsection 1 to a voter who resides within the continental United
States, the city clerk may use approved electronic transmission to
send an absent ballot and instructions to the voter. The voter may
mail the absent ballot to the city clerk or submit the absent ballot
by approved electronic transmission.
3. The return envelope sent pursuant to subsection 1 must
include postage prepaid by first-class mail if the absent voter is
within the boundaries of the United States, its territories or
possessions or on a military base.
4. Nothing may be enclosed or sent with an absent ballot
except as required by subsection 1 or 2 and chapter 293D of NRS.
5. Before depositing a ballot with the United States Postal
Service or sending a ballot by approved electronic transmission,
the city clerk shall record the date the ballot is issued, the name of
the registered voter to whom it is issued, the registered voter’s
precinct or district, the number of the ballot and any remarks the
city clerk finds appropriate.
6. The Secretary of State shall adopt regulations to carry out
the provisions of subsection 2.
Sec. 94. 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293D.200,
when an absent ballot is returned by an absent voter to the city
clerk through the mail, by facsimile machine or other approved
electronic transmission or in person, and record of its return is
made in the absent ballot record for the election, the city clerk or
an employee in the office of the city clerk shall:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), verify that
the last four digits of the driver’s license number or social security
number, as applicable, written on the return envelope match the
information of the voter in the records of the city clerk;
(b) If the voter has written the identification number issued by
the city clerk pursuant to NRS 293.507, verify that the
identification number matches the information of the voter in the
records of the city clerk; and
(c) Check the signature used for the absent ballot against all
signatures of the absent voter available in the records of the city
clerk.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, if the city
clerk determines pursuant to subsection 1 that the absent voter is
entitled to cast the absent ballot and:
-
*AB228*

– 66 –
(a) No absent ballot central counting board has been
appointed, the city clerk shall neatly stack, unopened, the absent
ballot with any other absent ballot received that day in a container
and deliver, or cause to be delivered, that container to the
appropriate election board.
(b) An absent ballot central counting board has been
appointed, the city clerk shall deposit the absent ballot in the
proper ballot box or place the absent ballot, unopened, in a
container that must be securely locked or under the control of the
city clerk at all times. At the end of each day before election day,
the city clerk may remove the absent ballots from each ballot box,
neatly stack the absent ballots in a container and seal the
container with a numbered seal. Not earlier than 4 working days
before the election, the city clerk shall deliver the absent ballots to
the absent ballot central counting board to be processed and
prepared for counting pursuant to the procedures established by
the Secretary of State to ensure the confidentiality of the prepared
ballots until after the polls have closed pursuant to NRS 293C.267
or 293C.297.
3. If the city clerk determines when checking the signature of
the absent voter pursuant to subsection 1 that the absent voter did
not include the necessary information or sign the return envelope
but is otherwise entitled to cast the absent ballot, the city clerk
shall contact the absent voter and advise the voter of the
procedures to provide the necessary information or a signature.
For the absent ballot to be counted, the absent voter must provide
a signature within the period for the counting of absent ballots
pursuant to subsection 2 of section 98 of this act.
Sec. 95. 1. If:
(a) A request for an absent ballot is made by a registered voter
in person; and
(b) The governing body of the city, pursuant to paragraph (b)
of subsection 2 of NRS 293C.110, has provided for voting by
absent ballot in person,
 the city clerk shall issue an absent ballot to the registered voter,
and the ballot must be voted on the premises of the city clerk’s
office and returned to the city clerk. The city clerk shall follow the
same procedure as in the case of absent ballots received by mail.
2. If the governing body of the city has provided for voting by
absent ballot in person pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 2
of NRS 293C.110, at least 20 days before a primary city election or
general city election until 5 p.m. on:
(a) The Friday before the election; or
(b) If the city clerk’s office is not scheduled to be open on the
Friday before the election, the Thursday before the election,
-
*AB228*

– 67 –
 each city clerk shall provide a voting booth, with suitable
equipment for voting, on the premises of the city clerk’s office for
use by registered voters who are issued absent ballots in
accordance with this section.
Sec. 96. 1. During the period specified in subsection 2 of
section 95 of this act when the city clerk’s office is maintained
with suitable equipment for voting an absent ballot in person:
(a) A person may not electioneer for or against any candidate,
measure or political party in or within 100 feet from the entrance
to the city clerk’s office.
(b) The city clerk shall keep continuously posted:
(1) At each entrance to the city clerk’s office, a sign on
which is printed in large letters “Polling Place for Voting Absent
Ballots”; and
(2) At the outer limits of the area within which
electioneering is prohibited, a sign on which is printed in large
letters “Distance Marker: No electioneering between this point
and any entrance to the city clerk’s office.”
2. Ropes or other suitable objects may be used at the city
clerk’s office to ensure compliance with this section.
3. Any person who willfully violates the provisions of this
section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
Sec. 97. 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
293.269951, chapter 293D of NRS and subsection 2 of section 93
of this act, to vote an absent ballot, the voter must:
(a) Mark and fold the absent ballot;
(b) Deposit the absent ballot in the return envelope and seal
the return envelope;
(c) Affix his or her signature on the return envelope in the
space provided for the signature;
(d) Write in the space provided on the return envelope one of
the following:
(1) The last four digits of his or her driver’s license number
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles;
(2) If the voter does not have a driver’s license number
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles, the last four digits of
his or her social security number; or
(3) If the voter does not have a driver’s license number
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles or a social security
number, the identification number issued by the county clerk
pursuant to NRS 293.507.
(e) Close the attached flap over the signature and identifying
numbers written on the return envelope; and
(f) Mail or deliver the return envelope in a manner authorized
by law.
-
*AB228*

– 68 –
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, if a
registered voter who has requested an absent ballot applies to vote
the absent ballot in person at:
(a) The office of the city clerk, the voter must vote the absent
ballot in the same manner as provided in subsection 1, and deliver
the envelope to the city clerk.
(b) A polling place, including, without limitation, a polling
place for early voting, the voter must surrender the absent ballot
and provide proof of identity before being issued a ballot to vote at
the polling place. A person who receives a surrendered absent
ballot shall mark it “Cancelled.”
3. If a registered voter who has requested an absent ballot by
mail applies to vote in person at the office of the city clerk or a
polling place, including, without limitation, a polling place for
early voting, and the registered voter does not have the absent
ballot to deliver or surrender, the voter must be issued a ballot to
vote if the registered voter:
(a) Provides proof of identity;
(b) Is a registered voter who is otherwise entitled to vote; and
(c) Signs an affirmation under penalty of perjury on a form
prepared by the Secretary of State declaring that the registered
voter has not voted during the election.
4. Except as otherwise provided in sections 89 and 90 of this
act, it is unlawful for any person to return an absent ballot other
than the voter who requested the absent ballot or, at the request of
the registered voter, a member of the immediate family of the
voter. A person who returns an absent ballot and who is a member
of the immediate family of the registered voter who requested the
absent ballot:
(a) Shall, under penalty of perjury, indicate on a form
prescribed by the city clerk that the person is a member of the
immediate family of the registered voter who requested the absent
ballot and that the registered voter requested that the person
return the absent ballot; and
(b) Shall not return more than two absent ballots belonging to
a member of the person’s immediate family for any election.
5. A person who violates the provisions of subsection 4 is
guilty of a category E felony and shall be punished as provided in
NRS 193.130.
Sec. 98. 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293D.200,
on the day of an election, the election boards receiving the absent
ballots from the city clerk shall, in the presence of a majority of
the election board officers, remove the absent ballots from the
ballot box and the containers in which the absent ballots were
-
*AB228*

– 69 –
transported pursuant to section 94 of this act and deposit the
absent ballots in the regular ballot box in the following manner:
(a) The name of the absent voter, as shown on the return
envelope or approved electronic transmission, must be called and
checked as if the absent voter were voting in person;
(b) If the board determines that the absent voter is entitled to
cast the absent ballot, the return envelope must be opened, the
numbers on the absent ballot and return envelope or approved
electronic transmission compared, the number strip or stub
detached from the absent ballot, and, if the numbers are the same,
the absent ballot deposited in the regular ballot box; and
(c) The election board officers shall indicate the roster
“Voted” by the name of the absent voter.
2. Counting of absent ballots must continue through the
seventh day following the elections.
Sec. 99. When all absent ballots delivered to the election
boards have been voted or rejected, except as otherwise provided
in NRS 293D.200, the empty envelopes and the envelopes and
approved electronic transmissions containing the rejected absent
ballots must be returned to the city clerk. On all envelopes and
approved electronic transmissions containing the rejected absent
ballots the cause of the rejection must be noted and the envelope
or approved electronic transmission signed by a majority of the
election board officers.
Sec. 100. 1. In cities in which an absent ballot central
counting board is appointed, the city clerk shall provide a ballot
box in the city clerk’s office for each different ballot listing in the
city.
2. On each box there must appear a statement indicating the
precincts and district for which the box has been designated.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293D.200, each
absent ballot voted must be deposited in a ballot box according to
the precinct or district of the absent voter voting that ballot.
Sec. 101. An error in the information included by a
registered voter in a form to request an absent ballot does not
constitute grounds for rejecting an absent ballot cast by the
registered voter.
Sec. 102. 1. Not earlier than 4 working days before the
election, the counting board, if it is responsible for counting
absent ballots, or the absent ballot central counting board shall
withdraw the absent ballots from each ballot box or container that
holds absent ballots received before that day and ascertain
whether each box or container has the required number of absent
ballots according to the city clerk’s absent ballot record for the
election.
-
*AB228*

– 70 –
2. The counting board or absent ballot central counting
board shall count the number of absent ballots in the same
manner as election boards.
Sec. 103. 1. Each day after the initial withdrawal of the
absent ballots pursuant to section 102 of this act and before the
day of the election, the counting board, if it is responsible for
counting absent ballots, or the absent ballot central counting
board shall withdraw from the appropriate ballot boxes or
containers all the absent ballots received the previous day and
determine whether each box or container has the required number
of absent ballots according to the city clerk’s absent ballot record
for the election.
2. If any absent ballots are received by the city clerk on
election day pursuant to section 89 of this act, the city clerk shall
deposit the absent ballots in the appropriate ballot boxes or
containers.
3. Not earlier than 4 working days before the election, the
appropriate board shall, in public, count the votes cast on the
absent ballots.
4. If paper ballots are used, the results of the absent ballot
vote in each precinct must be certified and submitted to the city
clerk, who shall have the results added to the regular votes of the
precinct. The returns of absent ballots must be reported separately
from the regular votes of the precinct, unless reporting the returns
separately would violate the secrecy of a voter’s ballot. The city
clerks shall develop a procedure to ensure that each ballot is kept
secret.
5. Any person who disseminates to the public information
relating to the count of absent ballots before the polls close is
guilty of a misdemeanor.
Sec. 104. The absent ballot inspection board shall:
1. Perform functions similar to those of the central ballot
inspection board and the ballot duplicating board as those
functions are applicable to absent ballots.
2. Bundle the empty absent ballot return envelopes according
to precinct and deliver the bundles to the city clerk.
3. Treat any absentee or mailing envelope found not to
contain a ballot as a rejected ballot and place that envelope in a
separate larger envelope on which must be written the ballot code
or precinct and the reason for the rejection.
Sec. 105. NRS 293C.110 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.110 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2
and NRS 293.5817 , [and 293C.263 to 293C.26337, inclusive,] the
conduct of any city election is under the control of the governing
-
*AB228*

– 71 –
body of the city, and it shall, by ordinance, provide for the holding
of the election, appoint the necessary election officers and election
boards and do all other things required to carry the election into
effect.
2. [The] Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293C.112, the
governing body of the city [may] shall provide for [the] :
(a) Absent ballots to be voted in a city election pursuant to
sections 83 to 100, inclusive, of this act, except for sections 95 and
96 of this act unless the governing body of the city provides for the
applicability of those provisions pursuant to paragraph (b); and
(b) The conduct of [early] :
(1) Early voting by personal appearance in a city election
pursuant to NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive, and 293C.355 to
293C.361, inclusive [.] ;
(2) Voting by absent ballot in person in a city election
pursuant to sections 95 and 96 of this act; or
(3) Both early voting by personal appearance as described
in subparagraph (1) and voting by absent ballot in person as
described in subparagraph (2).
Sec. 106. NRS 293C.112 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.112 1. The governing body of a city may conduct a city
election in which all ballots must be cast by mail [in accordance
with the provisions of NRS 293C.263 to 293C.26337, inclusive,] if:
(a) The election is a special election; or
(b) The election is a primary city election or general city
election in which the ballot includes only:
(1) Offices and ballot questions that may be voted on by the
registered voters of only one ward; or
(2) One office or ballot question.
2. The provisions of NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive,
293C.265 to 293C.302, inclusive, and 293C.355 to 293C.361,
inclusive, and sections 83 to 100, inclusive, of this act do not apply
to an election conducted pursuant to this section.
Sec. 107. NRS 293C.185 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.185 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293C.190,
a name may not be printed on a ballot to be used at a primary or
general city election unless the person named has, in accordance
with NRS 293C.145 or 293C.175, as applicable, timely filed a
declaration of candidacy with the appropriate filing officer and paid
the filing fee established by the governing body of the city.
2. A declaration of candidacy required to be filed pursuant to
this chapter must be in substantially the following form:
-
*AB228*

– 72 –
DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY OF ........ FOR THE
OFFICE OF ................

State of Nevada

City of ..............................

For the purpose of having my name placed on the official
ballot as a candidate for the office of .................., I,
.................., the undersigned do swear or affirm under penalty
of perjury that I actually, as opposed to constructively, reside
at .................., in the City or Town of .................., County of
.................., State of Nevada; that my actual, as opposed to
constructive, residence in the city, township or other area
prescribed by law to which the office pertains began on a date
at least 30 days immediately preceding the date of the close
of filing of declarations of candidacy for this office; that my
telephone number is .................., and the address at which I
receive mail, if different than my residence, is ..................;
that I am a qualified elector pursuant to Section 1 of Article 2
of the Constitution of the State of Nevada; that if I have ever
been convicted of treason or a felony, my civil rights have
been restored; that if nominated as a candidate at the ensuing
election I will accept the nomination and not withdraw; that I
will not knowingly violate any election law or any law
defining and prohibiting corrupt and fraudulent practices in
campaigns and elections in this State; that I will qualify for
the office if elected thereto, including, but not limited to,
complying with any limitation prescribed by the Constitution
and laws of this State concerning the number of years or
terms for which a person may hold the office; that I
understand that knowingly and willfully filing a declaration
of candidacy which contains a false statement is a crime
punishable as a gross misdemeanor and also subjects me to a
civil action disqualifying me from entering upon the duties of
the office; and that I understand that my name will appear on
all ballots as designated in this declaration.

........................................................
(Designation of name)

........................................................
(Signature of candidate for office)
-
*AB228*

– 73 –
Subscribed and sworn to before me
this ...... day of the month of ...... of the year ......

...................................................................
Notary Public or other person
authorized to administer an oath

3. The address of a candidate that must be included in the
declaration of candidacy pursuant to subsection 2 must be the street
address of the residence where the candidate actually, as opposed to
constructively, resides in accordance with NRS 281.050, if one has
been assigned. The declaration of candidacy must not be accepted
for filing if the candidate fails to comply with the following
provisions of this subsection or, if applicable, the provisions of
subsection 4:
(a) The candidate shall not list the candidate’s address as a post
office box unless a street address has not been assigned to the
residence; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the candidate
shall present to the filing officer:
(1) A valid driver’s license or identification card issued by a
governmental agency that contains a photograph of the candidate
and the candidate’s residential address; or
(2) A current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck, or
document issued by a governmental entity, including a check which
indicates the candidate’s name and residential address, but not
including a voter registration card.
4. If the candidate executes an oath or affirmation under
penalty of perjury stating that the candidate is unable to present to
the filing officer the [proof] evidence of residency required by
subsection 3 because a street address has not been assigned to the
candidate’s residence or because the rural or remote location of the
candidate’s residence makes it impracticable to present the [proof]
evidence of residency required by subsection 3, the candidate shall
present to the filing officer:
(a) A valid driver’s license or identification card issued by a
governmental agency that contains a photograph of the candidate;
and
(b) Alternative proof of the candidate’s residential address that
the filing officer determines is sufficient to verify where the
candidate actually, as opposed to constructively, resides in
accordance with NRS 281.050. The Secretary of State may adopt
regulations establishing the forms of alternative proof of the
candidate’s residential address that the filing officer may accept to
-
*AB228*

– 74 –
verify where the candidate actually, as opposed to constructively,
resides in accordance with NRS 281.050.
5. The filing officer shall retain a copy of the [proof] evidence
of identity and residency provided by the candidate pursuant to
subsection 3 or 4. Such a copy:
(a) May not be withheld from the public; and
(b) Must not contain the social security number, driver’s license
or identification card number or account number of the candidate.
6. By filing the declaration of candidacy, the candidate shall be
deemed to have appointed the city clerk as his or her agent for
service of process for the purposes of a proceeding pursuant to NRS
293C.186. Service of such process must first be attempted at the
appropriate address as specified by the candidate in the declaration
of candidacy. If the candidate cannot be served at that address,
service must be made by personally delivering to and leaving with
the city clerk duplicate copies of the process. The city clerk shall
immediately send, by registered or certified mail, one of the copies
to the candidate at the specified address, unless the candidate has
designated in writing to the city clerk a different address for that
purpose, in which case the city clerk shall mail the copy to the last
address so designated.
7. If the city clerk receives credible evidence indicating that a
candidate has been convicted of a felony and has not had his or her
civil rights restored, the city clerk:
(a) May conduct an investigation to determine whether the
candidate has been convicted of a felony and, if so, whether the
candidate has had his or her civil rights restored; and
(b) Shall transmit the credible evidence and the findings from
such investigation to the city attorney.
8. The receipt of information by the city attorney pursuant to
subsection 7 must be treated as a challenge of a candidate pursuant
to subsections 4 and 5 of NRS 293C.186 to which the provisions of
NRS 293.2045 apply.
9. Any person who knowingly and willfully files a declaration
of candidacy which contains a false statement in violation of this
section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
Sec. 108. NRS 293C.220 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.220 1. The city clerk shall appoint and notify registered
voters to act as election board officers for the various polling places
and precincts in the city as provided in NRS 293.225, 293.227,
293C.227, 293C.228 and [293C.26329.] sections 80, 81 and 100 of
this act. No candidate for nomination or election or a relative of the
candidate within the second degree of consanguinity or affinity may
be appointed as an election board officer. Immediately after election
-
*AB228*

– 75 –
board officers are appointed, if requested by the city clerk, the chief
law enforcement officer of the city shall:
(a) Appoint an officer for each polling place in the city and for
the central election board [and] or the [mail] absent ballot central
counting board; or
(b) Deputize, as an officer for the election, an election board
officer for each polling place and for the central election board [and]
or the [mail] absent ballot central counting board. The deputized
officer may not receive any additional compensation for the services
he or she provides as an officer during the election for which the
officer is deputized.
 Officers so appointed and deputized shall preserve order during
hours of voting and attend the closing of the polls.
2. The city clerk may appoint a trainee for the position of
election board officer as set forth in NRS 293C.222.
Sec. 109. NRS 293C.265 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.265 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2
and in NRS 293.2725 and 293.3083, a person who registered by
mail or computer to vote shall, for the first city election in which the
person votes at which that registration is valid, vote in person unless
he or she has previously voted in the county in which he or she is
registered to vote.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to a person who:
(a) Is entitled to vote [otherwise than in person] an absent ballot
pursuant to federal law or chapter 293D of NRS [;] or section 89 of
this act;
(b) Is disabled;
(c) Is provided the right to vote otherwise than in person
pursuant to the Voting Accessibility for the Elderly and
Handicapped Act, 52 U.S.C. §§ 20101 et seq.; [or]
(d) [Is sent a mail ballot pursuant to the provisions of NRS
293C.26312 and includes a copy of the information required
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 293.2725 with his
or her voted mail ballot, if required pursuant to NRS 293C.26314.]
Submits or has previously submitted a written request for an
absent ballot that is signed by the registered voter before a notary
public or other person authorized to administer an oath; or
(e) Requests an absent ballot in person at the office of the city
clerk.
Sec. 110. NRS 293C.2675 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.2675 1. If an Indian reservation or Indian colony is
located in whole or in part within a city, the city clerk shall, except
as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and 5, establish within the
-
*AB228*

– 76 –
boundaries of the Indian reservation or Indian colony at a location
approved by the Indian tribe for the day of a primary city election or
general city election a polling place . [and a ballot drop box.]
2. An Indian tribe may elect not to have a polling place [and
ballot drop box] established within the boundaries of an Indian
reservation or Indian colony for the day of a primary city election or
general city election by submitting notice to the city clerk on or
before:
(a) If the notice is for a primary city election, January 15 of the
year in which the primary city election is to be held.
(b) If the notice is for a general city election, June 15 of the year
in which the general city election is to be held.
3. Any location of a polling place [and ballot drop box]
established pursuant to subsection 1 must satisfy the criteria the city
clerk uses for the establishment of any other polling place , [and
ballot drop box,] as applicable.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the city clerk
must continue to establish one polling place [and ballot drop box]
within the boundaries of the Indian reservation or Indian colony at a
location approved by the Indian tribe for the day of any future
primary city election or general city election unless otherwise
notified by the Indian tribe pursuant to subsection 2.
5. Not later than the dates set forth in subsection 2 to elect not
to have a polling place [and ballot drop box] established within the
boundaries of the Indian reservation or Indian colony, an Indian
tribe that elects to have a polling place [and ballot drop box]
established must submit to the city clerk and the tribal liaison
designated by the Office of the Secretary of State pursuant to
NRS 233A.260:
(a) The location for the polling place [and ballot drop box] and
whether the location will have only a polling place ; [or ballot drop
box or both a polling place and ballot drop box;]
(b) Whether the Indian tribe will select registered voters to be
appointed to act as election board officers to staff the polling place
within the boundaries of the Indian reservation or Indian colony;
and
(c) The proposed days and hours for the operation of the polling
place.
 If an Indian tribe does not submit the information required
pursuant to this subsection, the Indian tribe shall be deemed to have
elected not to have a polling place [and ballot drop box] established
within the boundaries of the Indian reservation or Indian colony.
-
*AB228*

– 77 –
Sec. 111. NRS 293C.270 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.270 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.5772
to 293.5887, inclusive, and 293C.272, if a person’s name appears in
the roster or if the person provides an affirmation pursuant to NRS
293C.525, the person is entitled to vote and must [sign] :
(a) Present proof of identity; and
(b) Sign his or her name in the roster or on a signature card
when he or she applies to vote. Except as otherwise provided in
NRS 293.57691, the signature must be compared by an election
board officer with the signature or a facsimile thereof on the
person’s application to register to vote or [one of the forms of
identification listed in subsection 2.] on his or her proof of identity.
2. [The forms of identification that may be used to identify a
voter at the polling place are:
(a) The voter registration card issued to the voter;
(b) A driver’s license;
(c) An identification card issued by the Department of Motor
Vehicles;
(d) A military identification card; or
(e) Any other form of identification issued by a governmental
agency that contains the voter’s signature and physical description
or picture.
3.] The city clerk shall prescribe a procedure, approved by the
Secretary of State, to verify that the voter has not already voted in
that city in the current election.
Sec. 112. NRS 293C.272 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.272 1. If, because of physical limitations, a registered
voter is unable to sign his or her name in the roster or on a signature
card as required by NRS 293C.270, the voter must be identified by:
(a) Answering questions from the election board officer
covering the personal data which is reported on the application to
register to vote;
(b) Providing the election board officer, orally or in writing,
with other personal data which verifies the identity of the voter; or
(c) [Providing] Presenting the election board officer with his or
her proof of [identification as described in NRS 293C.270 other
than the voter registration card issued to the voter.] identity.
2. If the identity of the voter is verified, the election board
officer shall indicate in the roster “Identified” by the voter’s name.
Sec. 113. NRS 293C.275 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.275 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.5772
to 293.5887, inclusive, and 293C.272:
-
*AB228*

– 78 –
(a) A registered voter who applies to vote must state his or her
name to the election board officer in charge of the roster; and
(b) The election board officer shall:
(1) Announce the name of the registered voter;
(2) Require that the registered voter present proof of
identity;
(3) Instruct the registered voter to sign the roster or signature
card;
[(3)] (4) Verify the signature of the registered voter in the
manner set forth in NRS 293C.270; and
[(4)] (5) Verify that the registered voter has not already
voted in that city in the current election.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.57691, if the
signature does not match, the registered voter must be identified by:
(a) Either:
(1) Answering questions from the election board officer
covering the personal data which is reported on the application to
register to vote; or
[(b)] (2) Providing the election board officer, orally or in
writing, with other personal data which verifies the identity of the
registered voter; [or
(c) Providing] and
(b) Presenting the election board officer with proof of
[identification as described in NRS 293C.270 other than the voter
registration card issued to the voter.] identity.
3. If the signature of the registered voter has changed in
comparison to the signature on the application to register to vote, the
registered voter must update his or her signature on a form
prescribed by the Secretary of State.
4. For the purposes of subsection 2, the personal data of a
registered voter may include his or her date of birth.
Sec. 114. NRS 293C.277 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.277 1. A registered voter who applies to vote at an
election must give his or her name to the election board officer in
charge of the roster, and the officer shall immediately announce the
name of the registered voter [.] and require that the registered
voter present proof of identity.
2. Any person’s right to vote may be challenged by a registered
voter upon any of the grounds allowed for a challenge in NRS
293C.292. Any such challenge must be disposed of in the manner
provided in NRS 293C.292.
Sec. 115. NRS 293C.292 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.292 1. A person applying to vote may be challenged:
-
*AB228*

– 79 –
(a) Orally by any registered voter of the precinct or district upon
the ground that he or she is not the person entitled to vote as claimed
or has voted before at the same election; or
(b) On any ground set forth in a challenge filed with the county
clerk pursuant to the provisions of NRS 293.547.
2. If a person is challenged, an election board officer shall
tender the challenged person the following oath or affirmation:
(a) If the challenge is on the ground that the challenged person
does not reside at the residence for which the address is listed in the
roster, “I swear or affirm under penalty of perjury that I reside at the
residence for which the address is listed in the roster”;
(b) If the challenge is on the ground that the challenged person
previously voted a ballot for the election, “I swear or affirm under
penalty of perjury that I have not voted for any of the candidates or
questions included on this ballot for this election”; or
(c) If the challenge is on the ground that the challenged person is
not the person he or she claims to be, “I swear or affirm under
penalty of perjury that I am the person whose name is in this roster.”
 The oath or affirmation must be set forth on a form prepared by
the Secretary of State and signed by the challenged person under
penalty of perjury.
3. If the challenged person refuses to execute the oath or
affirmation so tendered, the person must not be issued a ballot, and
the election board officer shall indicate in the roster “Challenged”
by the person’s name.
4. If the challenged person refuses to execute the oath or
affirmation set forth in paragraph (a) of subsection 2, the election
board officers shall inform the person that he or she is entitled to
vote only in the manner prescribed in NRS 293C.295.
5. If the challenged person executes the oath or affirmation and
the challenge is not based on the ground set forth in paragraph (c) of
subsection 2, the election board officers shall issue him or her a
ballot.
6. If the challenge is based on the ground set forth in paragraph
(a) of subsection 2, and the challenged person executes the oath or
affirmation, the election board shall not issue the person a ballot
until he or she furnishes satisfactory identification that contains
proof of the address at which the person actually resides. For the
purposes of this subsection, a voter registration card does not
provide proof of the address at which a person resides.
7. If the challenge is based on the ground set forth in paragraph
(c) of subsection 2 and the challenged person executes the oath or
affirmation, the election board shall not issue the person a ballot
unless the person [:
-
*AB228*

– 80 –
(a) Furnishes official identification which contains a photograph
of the person, such as a driver’s license or other official document;
or
(b) Brings before the election board officers a person who is at
least 18 years of age who:
(1) Furnishes official identification which contains a
photograph of the person, such as a driver’s license or other official
document; and
(2) Executes an oath or affirmation under penalty of perjury
that the challenged person is who he or she swears to be.] furnishes
proof of identity.
8. The election board officers shall:
(a) Record on the challenge list:
(1) The name of the challenged person;
(2) The name of the registered voter who initiated the
challenge; and
(3) The result of the challenge; and
(b) If possible, orally notify the registered voter who initiated
the challenge of the result of the challenge.
Sec. 116. NRS 293C.302 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.302 1. If a court of competent jurisdiction orders a city
to extend the deadline for voting beyond the statutory period in an
election, the city clerk shall, as soon as practicable after receiving
notice of the decision of the court:
(a) Cause notice of the extended period to be published in a
newspaper of general circulation in the city or if no newspaper is of
general circulation in that city, in a newspaper of general circulation
in the nearest city; and
(b) Transmit a notice of the extended deadline to each registered
voter who [received a mail] requested an absent ballot for the
election and has not returned the [mail] ballot before the date on
which the notice will be transmitted.
2. The notice required pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1
must be published:
(a) In a city whose population is 25,000 or more, on at least 3
successive days.
(b) In a city whose population is less than 25,000, at least twice
in successive issues of the newspaper.
Sec. 117. NRS 293C.3035 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.3035 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.5772
to 293.5887, inclusive, and 293C.272, upon the appearance of a
person to cast a ballot at a polling place established pursuant to NRS
293C.3032, if any, the election board officer shall:
-
*AB228*

– 81 –
(a) Determine [that] whether the person is a registered voter in
the city and has not already voted in that city in the current election;
(b) Require the registered voter to present proof of identity;
(c) Instruct the registered voter to sign the roster or a signature
card; and
[(c)] (d) Verify the signature of the registered voter in the
manner set forth in NRS 293C.270.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.57691, if the
signature of the registered voter does not match, the registered voter
must be identified by:
(a) Either:
(1) Answering questions from the election board officer
covering the personal data which is reported on the application to
register to vote; or
[(b)] (2) Providing the election board officer, orally or in
writing, with other personal data which verifies the identity of the
voter; [or
(c) Providing] and
(b) Presenting the election board officer with proof of
[identification as described in NRS 293C.270 other than the voter
registration card issued to the voter.] identity.
3. If the signature of the registered voter has changed in
comparison to the signature on the application to register to vote, the
registered voter must update his or her signature on a form
prescribed by the Secretary of State.
4. The city clerk shall prescribe a procedure, approved by the
Secretary of State, to verify that the registered voter has not already
voted in that city in the current election.
5. When a registered voter is entitled to cast a ballot and has
identified himself or herself to the satisfaction of the election board
officer, the registered voter is entitled to receive the appropriate
ballot or ballots, but only for his or her own use at the polling place
where he or she applies to vote.
6. If the ballot is voted on a mechanical recording device which
directly records the votes electronically, the election board officer
shall:
(a) Prepare the mechanical voting device for the registered
voter;
(b) Ensure that the registered voter’s precinct or voting district
and the form of the ballot are indicated on the voting receipt, if the
city clerk uses voting receipts; and
(c) Allow the registered voter to cast a vote.
7. A registered voter applying to vote at a polling place
established pursuant to NRS 293C.3032, if any, may be challenged
pursuant to NRS 293C.292.
-
*AB228*

– 82 –
Sec. 118. NRS 293C.356 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.356 1. If a request is made to vote early by a registered
voter in person, the city clerk shall , except as otherwise provided in
NRS 293C.3585, issue a ballot for early voting to the voter. Such a
ballot must be voted on the premises of the clerk’s office and
returned to the clerk.
2. On the dates for early voting prescribed in NRS 293C.3568,
each city clerk shall provide a voting booth, with suitable equipment
for voting, on the premises of the city clerk’s office for use by
registered voters who are issued ballots for early voting in
accordance with this section.
Sec. 119. NRS 293C.3564 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.3564 1. The city clerk in a city providing for early
voting by personal appearance pursuant to subparagraph (1) of
paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of NRS 293C.110, shall establish at
least one permanent polling place for early voting by personal
appearance in the city at the locations selected pursuant to
NRS 293C.3561.
2. Any person entitled to vote early by personal appearance
may do so at any polling place for early voting.
Sec. 120. NRS 293C.3585 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.3585 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.5772
to 293.5887, inclusive, and 293C.272, upon the appearance of a
person to cast a ballot for early voting, an election board officer
shall:
(a) Determine that the person is a registered voter in the county.
(b) Require the registered voter to present proof of identity.
(c) Instruct the registered voter to sign the roster for early voting
or a signature card.
[(c)] (d) Verify the signature of the registered voter in the
manner set forth in NRS 293C.270.
[(d)] (e) Verify that the registered voter has not already voted in
that city in the current election.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.57691, if the
signature does not match, the registered voter must be identified by:
(a) Either:
(1) Answering questions from the election board officer
covering the personal data which is reported on the application to
register to vote; or
[(b)] (2) Providing the election board officer, orally or in
writing, with other personal data which verifies the identity of the
registered voter; [or
-
*AB228*

– 83 –
(c) Providing] and
(b) Presenting the election board officer with proof of
[identification as described in NRS 293C.270 other than the voter
registration card issued to the voter.] identity.
3. If the signature of the registered voter has changed in
comparison to the signature on the application to register to vote, the
registered voter must update his or her signature on a form
prescribed by the Secretary of State.
4. The city clerk shall prescribe a procedure, approved by the
Secretary of State, to verify that the registered voter has not already
voted in that city in the current election.
5. The roster for early voting or signature card, as applicable,
must contain:
(a) The registered voter’s name, the address where he or she is
registered to vote, his or her voter identification number and a place
for the registered voter’s signature;
(b) The registered voter’s precinct or voting district number, if
that information is available; and
(c) The date of voting early in person.
6. When a registered voter is entitled to cast a ballot and has
identified himself or herself to the satisfaction of the election board
officer, the registered voter is entitled to receive the appropriate
ballot or ballots, but only for his or her own use at the polling place
for early voting.
7. If the ballot is voted on a mechanical recording device which
directly records the votes electronically, the election board officer
shall:
(a) Prepare the mechanical recording device for the registered
voter;
(b) Ensure that the registered voter’s precinct or voting district,
if that information is available, and the form of ballot are indicated
on the voting receipt, if the city clerk uses voting receipts; and
(c) Allow the registered voter to cast a vote.
8. A registered voter applying to vote early by personal
appearance may be challenged pursuant to NRS 293C.292.
9. For the purposes of subsection 2, the personal data of a
registered voter may include his or her date of birth.
Sec. 121. NRS 293C.3615 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.3615 The city clerk shall make a record of the receipt at
the central counting place of each sealed container used to transport
official ballots pursuant to NRS 293C.295, 293C.630 and 293C.635
[.] and section 94 of this act. The record must include the numbers
indicated on the container and its seal pursuant to NRS 293C.700.
-
*AB228*

– 84 –
Sec. 122. NRS 293C.365 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.365 [Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293C.26331,
a] A counting board in any precinct, district or polling place in
which paper ballots are used may not begin to count the votes until
all ballots used or unused are accounted for.
Sec. 123. NRS 293C.390 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.390 1. The voted ballots, rejected ballots, spoiled
ballots, challenge lists, records printed on paper of voted ballots
collected pursuant to NRS 293B.400 [, reports prepared pursuant to
NRS 293C.26337] and stubs of the ballots used, enclosed and
sealed, must, after canvass of the votes by the governing body of the
city, be deposited in the vaults of the city clerk. The records of voted
ballots that are maintained in electronic form must, after canvass of
the votes by the governing body of the city, be sealed and deposited
in the vaults of the city clerk. The tally lists collected pursuant to
this title must, after canvass of the votes by the governing body of
the city, be deposited in the vaults of the city clerk without being
sealed. All materials described by this subsection must be preserved
for at least 22 months, and all such sealed materials must be
destroyed immediately after that period. A notice of the destruction
must be published by the city clerk in at least one newspaper of
general circulation in the city or, if no newspaper is of general
circulation in that city, in a newspaper of general circulation in the
nearest city, not less than 2 weeks before the destruction of the
materials.
2. Unused ballots, enclosed and sealed, must, after canvass of
the votes by the governing body of the city, be deposited in the
vaults of the city clerk and preserved for at least the period during
which the election may be contested and adjudicated, after which
the unused ballots may be destroyed.
3. The rosters containing the signatures of those persons who
voted in the election and the tally lists deposited with the governing
body of the city are subject to the inspection of any elector who may
wish to examine them at any time after their deposit with the city
clerk.
4. A contestant of an election may inspect all of the material
relating to that election which is preserved pursuant to subsection 1
or 2, except the voted ballots and records printed on paper of voted
ballots collected pursuant to NRS 293B.400 which are deposited
with the city clerk.
5. The voted ballots and records printed on paper of voted
ballots collected pursuant to NRS 293B.400 which are deposited
with the city clerk are not subject to the inspection of any person,
-
*AB228*

– 85 –
except in cases of a contested election, and only by the judge, body
or board before whom the election is being contested, or by the
parties to the contest, jointly, pursuant to an order of the judge, body
or board.
6. As used in this section, “vaults of the city clerk” means any
place of secure storage designated by the city clerk.
Sec. 124. NRS 293C.640 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.640 1. To facilitate the processing and computation of
votes cast at an election conducted under a mechanical voting
system, the city clerk shall create a computer program and
processing accuracy board, and may create:
(a) A central ballot inspection board;
(b) [A mail] An absent ballot inspection board;
(c) A ballot duplicating board;
(d) A ballot processing and packaging board; and
(e) Such additional boards or appoint such officers as the city
clerk deems necessary for the expeditious processing of ballots.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the city clerk
may determine the number of members to constitute any board. The
city clerk shall make any appointments from among competent
persons who are registered voters in this State. The same person
may be appointed to more than one board but must meet the
qualifications for each board to which he or she is appointed.
3. If the city clerk creates a ballot duplicating board, the city
clerk shall appoint to the board at least two members. The members
of the ballot duplicating board must not all be of the same political
party.
4. All persons appointed pursuant to this section serve at the
pleasure of the city clerk.
Sec. 125. NRS 293C.700 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.700 1. Each container used to transport official ballots
pursuant to NRS 293C.295, 293C.630 and 293C.635 and section 94
of this act must:
(a) Be constructed of metal or any other rigid material; and
(b) Contain a seal which is placed on the container to ensure
detection of any opening of the container.
2. The container and seal must be separately numbered for
identification.
Sec. 126. NRS 293C.720 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.720 Each city clerk is encouraged to:
1. Not later than the earlier date of the first notice provided
pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 293.560 or NRS 293C.187, notify
-
*AB228*

– 86 –
the public, through means designed to reach members of the public
who are elderly or disabled, of the provisions of NRS [293C.263,]
293C.281 and 293C.282 [.] and sections 87, 89 and 90 of this act.
2. Provide in alternative audio and visual formats information
concerning elections, information concerning how to preregister or
register to vote and information concerning the manner of voting for
use by a person who is elderly or disabled, including, without
limitation, providing such information through a
telecommunications device that is accessible to a person who is
deaf.
3. Not later than 5 working days after receiving the request of a
person who is elderly or disabled, provide to the person, in a format
that can be used by the person, any requested material that is:
(a) Related to elections; and
(b) Made available by the city clerk to the public in printed
form.
Sec. 127. NRS 293D.300 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293D.300 1. A covered voter who is registered to vote in this
State may apply for a military-overseas ballot by submitting a
federal postcard application, as prescribed under section 101(b)(2)
of the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 52
U.S.C. § 20301(b)(2), or the application’s electronic equivalent, if
the federal postcard application or the application’s electronic
equivalent is received by the appropriate local elections official
before the time set pursuant to NRS 293.273 for closing the polls on
election day.
2. A covered voter who is not registered to vote in this State
may use the federal postcard application or the application’s
electronic equivalent simultaneously to apply to register to vote
pursuant to NRS 293D.230 and to apply for a military-overseas
ballot, if the federal postcard application or the application’s
electronic equivalent is received by the appropriate local elections
official before the time set pursuant to NRS 293.273 for closing the
polls on election day. If the federal postcard application is received
after the time set for closing the polls, it must be treated as an
application to register to vote for subsequent elections.
3. Upon receipt of the electronic equivalent of the federal
postcard application pursuant to subsection 1 or 2, the local
elections official shall affix, mark or otherwise acknowledge receipt
of the application by means of a time stamp on the application.
4. The Secretary of State shall ensure that the system of
approved electronic transmission described in subsection 2 of NRS
293D.200 is capable of accepting the submission of:
-
*AB228*

– 87 –
(a) Both a federal postcard application and any other approved
electronic military-overseas ballot application sent to the appropriate
local elections official; and
(b) A digital signature or an electronic signature of a covered
voter on the documents described in paragraph (a).
5. A covered voter may use approved electronic transmission
or any other method approved by the Secretary of State to apply for
a military-overseas ballot.
6. A covered voter may use the declaration accompanying the
federal write-in absentee ballot, as prescribed under section 103 of
the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 52
U.S.C. § 20303, as an application for a military-overseas ballot
simultaneously with the submission of the federal write-in absentee
ballot, if the declaration and the federal write-in absentee ballot are
received by the appropriate local elections official before the time
set pursuant to NRS 293.273 for closing the polls on election day.
7. To receive the benefits of this chapter, a covered voter must
inform the appropriate local elections official that he or she is a
covered voter. Methods of informing the appropriate local elections
official that a person is a covered voter include, without limitation:
(a) The use of a federal postcard application or federal write-in
absentee ballot;
(b) The use of an overseas address on an approved voting
registration application or ballot application; and
(c) The inclusion on an application to register to vote or an
application for a military-overseas ballot of other information
sufficient to identify that the person is a covered voter.
8. This chapter does not prohibit a covered voter from [voting a
mail] applying for an absent ballot pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 293 or 293C of NRS or voting in person.
Sec. 128. NRS 298.250 is hereby amended to read as follows:
298.250 1. If a former resident of the State of Nevada
otherwise qualified to vote in another state in any election for
President and Vice President of the United States has commenced
his or her residence in the other state after the 30th day next
preceding that election and for this reason does not satisfy the
requirements for registration in the other state, the former resident
may vote for President and Vice President only in that election:
(a) In person in the county of the State of Nevada which was his
or her former residence, if the former resident is otherwise qualified
to vote there; or
(b) By [mail] absent ballot in the county of the State of Nevada
which was his or her former residence, if the former resident is
otherwise qualified to vote there and complies with the applicable
-
*AB228*

– 88 –
requirements of [NRS 293.269911 to 293.269937,] sections 8 to 23,
inclusive [.] , of this act.
2. The Secretary of State may, in a manner consistent with the
election laws of this State, adopt regulations to effectuate the
purposes of this section.
Sec. 129. NRS 298.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
298.600 As used in NRS 298.600 to 298.720, inclusive, the
words and terms defined in NRS [298.610,] 298.620 and 298.630
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 130. NRS 298.690 is hereby amended to read as follows:
298.690 1. In conducting a presidential preference primary
election, the county clerk shall:
(a) Distribute sample ballots for the presidential preference
primary election;
(b) Establish polling places for early voting by personal
appearance;
(c) Permit voting by registered voters of the major political party
by [mail] absent ballot , [and] military-overseas ballot in the manner
and within the time required by chapters 293 and 293D of NRS; and
(d) Establish polling places for the day of the presidential
preference primary election. The provisions of NRS 293.273 apply
to the presidential preference primary election.
2. A registered voter who is entitled to cast a ballot at the
presidential preference primary election may do so at any polling
place in the county.
Sec. 131. NRS 483.820 is hereby amended to read as follows:
483.820 1. A person who applies for an identification card in
accordance with the provisions of NRS 483.810 to 483.890,
inclusive, and who is not ineligible to receive an identification card
pursuant to NRS 483.861, is entitled to receive an identification card
if the person is:
(a) A resident of this State and is 10 years of age or older and
does not hold a valid driver’s license or identification card from any
state or jurisdiction; or
(b) A seasonal resident who does not hold a valid Nevada
driver’s license.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 483.825 [,] and
section 30 of this act, the Department shall charge and collect the
following fees for the issuance of an original, duplicate or changed
identification card:

An original or duplicate identification card
issued to a person 65 years of age or older
which expires on or before the fourth
anniversary of the person’s birthday ............................... $4
-
*AB228*

– 89 –
An original or duplicate identification card
issued to a person 65 years of age or older
which expires on or before the eighth
anniversary of the person’s birthday ............................... $8
An original or duplicate identification card
issued to a person under 18 years of age
which expires on the eighth anniversary of
the person’s birthday ......................................................... 6
A renewal of an identification card for a person
under 18 years of age which expires on the
eighth anniversary of the person’s birthday ...................... 6
An original or duplicate identification card
issued to a person under 18 years of age
which expires on or before the fourth
anniversary of the person’s birthday ................................. 3
A renewal of an identification card for a person
under 18 years of age which expires on or
before the fourth anniversary of the person’s
birthday ............................................................................. 3
An original or duplicate identification card
issued to any person at least 18 years of age,
but less than 65 years of age, which expires
on the eighth anniversary of the person’s
birthday ........................................................................... 18
A renewal of an identification card for any
person at least 18 years of age, but less than
65 years of age, which expires on the eighth
anniversary of the person’s birthday ............................... 18
An original or duplicate identification card
issued to any person at least 18 years of age,
but less than 65 years of age, which expires
on or before the fourth anniversary of the
person’s birthday ............................................................... 9
A renewal of an identification card for any
person at least 18 years of age, but less than
65 years of age, which expires on or before
the fourth anniversary of the person’s
birthday ............................................................................. 9
A new photograph or change of name, or both ...................... 4

3. The Department shall not charge a fee for:
(a) An identification card issued to a person who has voluntarily
surrendered his or her driver’s license pursuant to NRS 483.420; or
(b) A renewal of an identification card for a person 65 years of
age or older.
-
*AB228*

– 90 –
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 483.825 [,] and
section 30 of this act, the increase in fees authorized in NRS
483.347 must be paid in addition to the fees charged pursuant to this
section.
5. As used in this section, “photograph” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 483.125.
Sec. 132. NRS 293.0653, 293.269911, 293.269913,
293.269915, 293.269917, 293.269919, 293.269921, 293.269923,
293.269925, 293.269927, 293.269929, 293.269931, 293.269933,
293.269935, 293.269937, 293C.263, 293C.26312, 293C.26314,
293C.26316, 293C.26318, 293C.26321, 293C.26323, 293C.26325,
293C.26327, 293C.26329, 293C.26331, 293C.26333, 293C.26335,
293C.26337 and 298.610 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 133. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage
and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 132, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
LEADLINES OF REPEALED SECTIONS
293.0653 “Mail ballot” defined.
293.269911 Preparation and distribution of mail ballots;
exceptions; mail ballot contents; time for distribution; mootness
of untimely legal action which would prevent distribution.
293.269913 Methods of distribution and other
requirements for mail ballots and supporting materials;
recordation of certain information by county clerk.
293.269915 Requirements for mail ballots distributed to
certain voters who have not previously voted in election for
federal office in Nevada; exceptions; treatment as provisional
ballot under certain circumstances.
293.269917 Procedure for voting by mail ballot; procedure
for voting in person after mail ballot sent to voter.
293.269919 Unlawful to mark and sign mail ballot on
behalf of voter or assist voter to mark and sign mail ballot;
exceptions.
293.269921 Procedure for timely returning mail ballot;
treatment of mail ballot when postmark cannot be determined;
requirements for ballot drop boxes.
-
*AB228*

– 91 –
293.269923 Persons authorized to return mail ballot,
unlawful acts relating to return of mail ballot; penalty.
293.269925 Establishment of procedures for processing and
counting mail ballots.
293.269927 Duties of county clerk upon return of mail
ballot: Procedure for checking signatures; safeguarding and
delivery of mail ballots for counting; procedure to contact voter
to remedy certain defects in returned mail ballot.
293.269929 Appointment and membership of mail ballot
central counting board; board under direction of county clerk.
293.269931 Period for counting mail ballots; counting must
be public; rejection of certain mail ballots.
293.269933 Process for counting mail ballots; requirements
relating to empty envelopes and rejected mail ballots.
293.269935 Certification and reporting of mail ballot
results; secrecy of mail ballots; unlawful to disseminate
information about mail ballot results before polls close and all
votes cast on election day; penalty.
293.269937 County clerk to test accuracy of electronic
devices used to verify signatures on mail ballots; daily audit
required during processing of mail ballots.
293C.263 Preparation and distribution of mail ballots;
exceptions; mail ballot contents; time for distribution; mootness
of untimely legal action which would prevent distribution.
293C.26312 Methods of distribution and other
requirements for mail ballots and supporting materials;
recordation of certain information by city clerk.
293C.26314 Requirements for mail ballots distributed to
certain voters who have not previously voted in election for
federal office in Nevada; exceptions; treatment as provisional
ballot under certain circumstances.
293C.26316 Procedure for voting by mail ballot; procedure
for voting in person after mail ballot sent to voter.
293C.26318 Unlawful to mark and sign mail ballot on
behalf of voter or assist voter to mark and sign mail ballot;
exceptions.
293C.26321 Procedure for timely returning mail ballot;
treatment of mail ballot when postmark cannot be determined;
requirements for ballot drop boxes.
293C.26323 Persons authorized to return mail ballot;
unlawful acts relating to return of mail ballot; penalty.
293C.26325 Establishment of procedures for processing
and counting mail ballots.
293C.26327 Duties of city clerk upon return of mail ballot:
Procedure for checking signatures; safeguarding and delivery of
-
*AB228*

– 92 –
mail ballots for counting; procedure to contract voter to remedy
certain defects in returned mail ballot.
293C.26329 Appointment and membership of mail ballot
central counting board; board under direction of city clerk.
293C.26331 Period for counting mail ballots; requirements
relating to empty envelopes and rejected mail ballots.
293C.26333 Process for counting mail ballots; counting
must be public; rejection of certain mail ballots.
293C.26335 Certification and reporting of mail ballot
results; secrecy of mail ballots; unlawful to disseminate
information about mail ballot return results before polls close
and all votes cast on election day; penalty.
293C.26337 City clerk to test accuracy of electronic devices
used to verify signatures on mail ballots; daily audit required
during processing of mail ballots.
298.610 “Mail ballot” defined.
H
-
*AB228*